<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89712-0082 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-12-89.f2.A1081</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Biweekly Notice Applications and Amendments to Operating LicensesInvolving No Significant Hazards Considerations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>Pursuant to Public Law (P.L.) 97-415, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission(the Commission) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. P.L. 97-415revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, orproposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act.This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediatelyeffective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination bythe Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration,notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearingfrom any person. from any person. This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposedto be issued from June 19, 1989 through June 29, 1989. The last biweeklynotice was published on June 28, 1989 (54 FR 27221). <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATINGLICENSE AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION DETERMINATIONAND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING </ITAG>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendmentrequests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission'sregulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facilityin accordance with the proposed amendments would not (1) involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for eachamendment request is shown below. The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination.Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of thisnotice will be considered in making any final determination. The Commissionwill not normally make a final determination unless it receives a requestfor a hearing. Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Regulatory PublicationsBranch, Division of Freedom of Information and Publications Services, Officeof Administration and Resources Management, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and should cite the publication date and page numberof this <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Written comments may also be deliveredto Room P-216, Phillips Building, 7920 Norfolk Avenue, Bethesda, Marylandfrom 7:30 a.m. to 4:15 p.m. Copies of written comments received may beexamined at the NRC Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,NW., Washington, DC The filing of requests for hearing and petitions forleave to intervene is discussed below. By August 11, 1989 the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respectto issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating licenseand any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and whowishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a writtenpetition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and petitions forleave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rulesof Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. If arequest for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by theabove date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designatedby the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition and the Secretaryor the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a noticeof hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding,and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determinationon the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determinationwill serve to decide when the hearing is held. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significanthazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and makeit immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Anyhearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment. If the final determination is that the amendment involves a significanthazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuanceof any amendment. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expirationof the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change duringthe notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result,for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission mayissue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day noticeperiod, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involvesno significant hazards consideration. The final determination will considerall public and State comments received before action is taken. Should theCommission take this action, it will publish a notice of issuance and providefor opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects thatthe need to take this action will occur very infrequently. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building,2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitionsare filed during the last ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requestedthat the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephonecall to Western Union at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number3737 and the following message addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or thepresiding Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or requestshould be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application foramendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission'sPublic Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington,DC, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved.<ITAG tagnum="84">Alabama Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-348 and 50-364, Joseph M. FarleyNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Houston County, Alabama </ITAG><T3>Date of amendments request: </T3>March 20, 1989 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldchange the Technical Specifications (TS) to: 1. Clarify the wording of TS 4.2.2.2.f.3. to more accurately and correctlydefine the grid plane regions of the core where Fxy limits are not applicable.2. Delete Figure 3.3-1, Time Delay Curves, to correct an error (curvesnot used) and revise Table 3.3-4 to delete the footnote reference to thedeleted Figure 3.3.-1. 3. Correct a typographical error in Table 3.3-3 for spelling of automatic.4. Change Table 4.3-4 to correct the locations of seismic instrumentationand correct two typographical errors in the Table. 5. Revise the addressee for reporting information to the NRC per 10 CFR50.4 in TSs 3.11.4, 6.9.1, 6.9.1.10, 6.9.1.11, and 6.9.2 as editorial changes.6. Modify TS 3.6.4.1. Action a. to add that the provisions of TS 3.0.4are not applicable and to add an alternate hydrogen sampling capabilitywhen one hydrogen analyzer is inoperable. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a nosignificant hazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c).A proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has provided significant hazards evaluations in Attachment2 to its request for a license amendment. In the evaluations the licenseehas concluded, with appropriate bases, that the proposed amendment meetsthe three standards in 10 CFR 50.92 and, therefore, involves no significanthazards considerations. We have reviewed the licensee's evaluations. In our review we used the Commission guidance set forth in 10 CFR 50.92which provided certain examples of no significant hazards considerationspublished in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on March 6, 1986 (51 FR 7744). One of the examplesof actions involving no significant hazards consideration, example (i),involves a purely administrative change to the TS, for example, a changeto achieve consistency throughout the TS, to correct an error, or to changenomenclature. Based on the similarity of proposed changes, 1 through 5 above, to example(i), the NRC staff concludes that these changes in the proposed amendmentare not likely to involve a significant hazards consideration. For proposedchange 6 above, relating to use of containment hydrogen analyzers, thelicensee made the following determination: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed change will not increase the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated because the proposed change does noteliminate the requirement to monitor hydrogen concentration inside containmentduring Modes 1 and 2. This change will allow startup of the plant withone hydrogen analyzer inoperable. Hydrogen concentration can be determinedwith one analyzer inoperable by use of the redundant hydrogen analyzerand by local sampling using existing approved plant post-accident samplingprocedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed change will not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated becausethe proposed change does not alter the intent of the specification. Redundantmonitoring of hydrogen concentration can be performed with one hydrogenanalyzer inoperable during plant startup by means of post-accident samplingprocedures. Therefore, possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously evaluated does not exist. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed change will not involve a reduction in a margin ofsafety because the proposed change does not lessen the requirements formonitoring hydrogen concentration. The proposed change allows for an alternativemethod for monitoring hydrogen concentration with one hydrogen analyzerinoperable during plant startup. Therefore, no reduction of margin of safetywill result from this change. </ITAG>We agree with the licensee's specific evaluation that the changes meetthe three standards in 10 CFR 50.92. Accordingly, the Commission proposesto determine that the proposed amendment does not involve significant hazardsconsiderations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Houston-Love Memorial Library,212 W. Burdeshaw Street, P. O. Box 1369, Dothan, Alabama 36302 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-400, ShearonHarris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1, Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 17, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TS) for the Shearon Harris NuclearPower Plant, Unit 1 (Harris or SHNPP) to permit core reload and operationwith Westinghouse 17x17 VANTAGE 5 fuel assemblies. Harris is presentlyoperating with Westinghouse 17x17 low-parasitic (LOPAR) fuel assemblies.The transition from a complete LOPAR core to a complete VANTAGE 5 corewill be accomplished over three cycles. The proposed revisions to the TSsupport operation with each of the transition cores and all subsequentcores using only VANTAGE 5 fuel. Design features of the VANTAGE 5 fuel include integral fuel burnable absorbers,intermediate flow mixers, reconstitutible top nozzles, axial blankets,optimized fuel rod diameter, and extended burnup capability. Changes tothe TS are required due to the use of VANTAGE 5 fuel and use of the followinganalytical methods and assumptions: (1) The Improved Thermal Design Procedure (ITDP); (2) The WRB-1 and WRB-2 departure from nucleate boiling (DNB) correlations;(3) Large break loss-of-coolant accident (LOCA) analyses using the 1981evaluation model and the BASH model; (4) Small break LOCA analyses using the NOTRUMP model; and (5) F<T2>q</T2>(z) surveillance. As a result of the above, changes to the following Technical Specificationsare proposed: (1) Core Safety Limits (TS 2.1.1, Figure 2.1-1); (2) Reactor Coolant Flow Trip Setpoint and Allowable Values (TS 2.2.1,Table 2.2-1); (3) Overtemperature delta T and Overpower delta T Reactor Trip Setpoint(TS 2.2.1, Table 2.2-1); (4) DNB Correlations, DNB Ratio Limits, Power Range Neutron Flux High Rate,and F delta H Limit Uncertainties (Bases 2.1.1); (5) Rod Drop Time (TS 3.1.3.4); (6) Heat Flux Hot Channel Factor - F<T2>q</T2>(Z) (TS 3/4.2.2. Bases 3/4.2.2); (7) Reactor Coolant System Flow Rate and Nuclear Enthalpy Rise Hot ChannelFactor (TS 3/4.2.3); (8) DNB Parameters (TS 3/4.2.5, Table 3.2.1, Bases 3/4.2.5); and (9) Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumenatation Trip Setpoints(TS 3/4.3.2, Table 3.3-4). In addition, the proposed amendment would revise TS 3.1.3.5, 3.1.3.6, and3.2.1 to replace the values of cycle-specific parameter limits with a referenceto the Core Operating Limits Report (COLR), which contains the values ofthose limits. The COLR also has been included in the Definitions Sectionof the TS to note that it is the unit-specific document that provides theselimits for the current operating reload cycle. As such, the Peaking FactorLimit Report, Section 6.9.1.6 of the current administrative controls, isincorporated into the COLR. Futhermore, the definition notes that the valuesof these cycle-specific parameter limits are to be determined in accordancewith the Specification 6.9.1.6. This specification requires that the CoreOperating Limits be determined for each reload cycle in accordance withthe referenced NRC-approved methodology for these limits and consistentwith the applicable limits of the safety analysis. Finally, this reportand any mid-cycle revisions shall be provided to the NRC upon issuance.Generic Letter 88-16, dated October 4, 1988, from the NRC provided guidanceto licensees on requests for removal of the values of cycle-specific parameterlimits from TS. The licensee's proposed changes are in response to thisGeneric Letter. This proposed amendment also includes two Cycle 2 administrative corrections:(1) the deletion of Surveillance Requirement 4.2.1.1.a.2 requiring monitoringand logging of indicated Axial Flux Difference (AFD) for a 24-hour periodafter the automatic computer monitoring is returned to an operable statusas a result of relaxed AFD monitoring, and (2) deletion of a referenceto TS 3.1.1.1 in Action 5 of TS 3.3.1 (Table 3.3-1) because it is no longerapplicable. Since the two Cycle 2 corrections relate to previously approvedchanges, they are administrative in nature. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an Operating License for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityof consequences of an accident previously evaluated, or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided the followingno significant hazards consideration determination: <ITAG tagnum="21">a. The probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluatedis not significantly increased. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The VANTAGE 5 reload fuel assemblies are mechanically and hydraulicallycompatible with the current low parasitic (LOPAR) fuel assemblies, controlrods, reactor internals interfaces, the fuel handling equipment, and therefueling equipment. The VANTAGE 5 design dimensions are essentially equivalentto the current SHNPP LOPAR assembly design from an exterior assembly envelopeand reactor internals interface standpoint. Also, the implementation ofVANTAGE 5 fuel does not cause a significant change in the physics characteristicsof the SHNPP cores beyond the normal range of variation seen from cycleto cycle. Thus, both fuel types satisfy the design basis for SHNPP as proposedfor this amendment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes have been assessed from a core design and safetyanalysis standpoint. No increase in the probability of occurrence of anyaccident was identified, but an extensive reanalysis, as described in theReload Transition Safety Report, was required to demonstrate compliancewith the revised SHNPP Technical Specifications as proposed herein. Thesereanalyses applied methods which have been previously found acceptabe bythe NRC. The results, which includes transition core effects, show changesin consequences of accidents previously analyzed. However, the resultsare all clearly within pertinent acceptance criteria and demonstrate theplant's capability to operate safely at 100 percent power. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The use of a Core Operating Limits Report follows the guidelines setforth in NRC Generic Letter 88-16, Removal of Cycle-Specific ParameterLimits from Technical Specifications. The use of this report is administrativein nature and does not impact the present analyses or future analyses sincethe relaxed axial offset control and rod insertion limits will continueto be calculated with approved NRC methodology. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Cycle 2 corrections which include the elimination of SurveillanceRequirement 4.2.1.1.a.2 requiring monitoring and logging of indicated AFDfor a 24-hour period after the automatic computer monitoring is returnedto an operable status and the deletion of a reference to LCO 3.1.1.1 inAction 5 of TS 3.3.1 are strictly administrative in nature and as such,do not significantly increase the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Thus, it is concluded that there is not a significant increase inthe consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The possibility for an accident or malfunction of a different typethan any evaluated previously in the safety analysis reports is not created.These proposed changes do not significantly affect the overall method andmanner of SHNPP operation and can be accommodated without compromisingthe performance or qualification of safety-related equipment. Thus, thecreation of a new accident or different kind of accident from any previouslyevaluated accident is not considered a possibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. The margins of safety as defined in the bases of the TechnicalSpecifications are not significantly reduced. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The analysis of the LOPAR and VANTAGE 5 fuel is based on the NRC approvedImproved Thermal Design Procedure (ITDP) (WCAP-8567, ``Improved ThermalDesign Procedure''). The LOPAR fuel analysis uses the WRB-1 DNB correlation,while the VANTAGE 5 fuel analysis utilizes the WRB-2 DNB correlation. TheseDNB correlations take credit for the significant improvement in the accuracyof the critical heat flux predictions in comparison with previous DNB correlations.The WRB-2 DNB correlation also takes credit for the VANTAGE 5 fuel assemblymixing vane design. A DNBR limit of 1.17 is applicable for both the WRB-1and WRB-2 correlations. In addition, the W-3 DNBR correlation is used whereappropriate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">When appropriate, the design method employed to meet the DNB designbasis is the ITDP. Uncertainties in plant operating parameters, nuclearand thermal parameters, and fuel fabrication parameters are consideredstatistically such that there is at least 95 percent probability at a 95percent confidence level that the mininum DNBR will be greater than orequal to 1.17 for the limiting power rod. Plant parameter uncertaintiesare used to determine the plant DNBR uncertainties. These DNBR uncertainties,combined with the DNBR limit, establish a DNBR value which must be metin plant safety analyses. In addition to the above considerations, specificplant DNBR margin is included in the analyses. A part of the plant-specificmargin is used to accommodate a transition core penalty due to the localizedflow redistribution resulting from the VANTAGE 5 intermediate flow mixinggrids and an appropriate fuel rod bow DNBR penalty. Since the parametersuncertainties are considered in determining the design DNBR value, theplant safety analyses are performed using values of input parameters withoutuncertainties. The change to ITDP and the use of new DNBR correlationsdoes not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety sincethe DNB design basis (i.e., that there is a 95% probability with a 95%confidence level that the hottest rod does not experience DNB) remainsunchanged. In addition, the increased core hydraulic resistance due tothe IFM grids results in an increase in the control rod scram time to thedashpot from 2.2 seconds to 2.7 seconds. This increase, as well as theother effects of the changes in the design, have been incorporated in thenon-LOCA and LOCA transient analyses. In some cases, an increase in a parameter(such as pressure or peak clad temperature) occurs and may reduce the marginbetween the anaysis and the pertinent acceptance criterion. The resultsof the new non-LOCA analyses indicate that the ANS Condition II, III, andIV acceptance criteria as endorsed by NRC NUREG-0800 are still met. Theresults of the new LOCA analyses indicate that for breaks up to a double-endedseverence of the reactor coolant piping, the Emergency Core Cooling Systemwill meet the acceptance criteria of 10CFR50.46. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The use of the Core Operating Limits Report is admininstrative anddoes not impact existing analyses or future analyses since the relaxedaxial offset control limits and rod insertion limits will continue to bedetermined for each cycle using NRC approved methodology. As indicatedin proposed Technical Specification 6.9.1.6, these limits shall continueto be determined so that all applicable limits of the safety analyses aremet. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Cycle 2 corrections are administrative in nature and as such,do not significantly reduce the margins of safety as defined in the basesof the Technical Specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, the results of the changes are clearly within all pertinentdesign and safety acceptance criteria using approved methods. Thus, thereis no significant reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG>The licensee has concluded that the proposed amendment meets the threestandards in 10 CFR 50.92 and, therefore, involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The NRC staff has made a preliminary review of the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination and agrees with the licensee's analysis.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Cameron Village RegionalLibrary, 1930 Clark Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27605. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-400, ShearonHarris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1, Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 5, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment request modifiesthe procedure for obtaining the gross radioactivity for the reactor coolantspecific activity determination. Specifically, the note on Item 1 of TechnicalSpecification (TS) Table 4.4-4 would be deleted and the count describedin Bases 3/4.4.8 would be performed in its place. This change will removethe gaseous activity determination from this gross activity determination.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards in 10 CFR 50.92(c) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an Operating License for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated, or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided the followingno significant hazards consideration determination: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.Deleting the detailed analysis of the RCS liquid required by the note andperforming a gross beta/gamma activity determination in its place doesnot physically alter any safety related systems nor does it affect theway in which any safety related systems perform their functions. As such,the proposed change can not increase the probability of a previously evaluatedaccident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment revises the method in which RCS specific activityis determined. The existing Technical Specification requires the RCS gaseousactivity be determined and included in the overall RCS liquid specificactivity. RCS gaseous activity would not be determined by the proposedanalysis. Recent testing has demonstrated that for the purposes of thegross radioactivity determination, RCS gaseous activity is insignificantwhen compared to overall RCS liquid activity. Specific activity was determinedusing both the existing analysis and the proposed analysis. The resultsof these analyses were on the same order of magnitude. A degradation offuel performance would be readily detectable by an increase in the sample'snon-gaseous fission products. As such, the proposed analysis is adequateto fulfill the intent of the gross radioactivity determination requiredby Technical Specification Table 4.4-4, Item 1. Therefore, the proposedamendment does not significantly increase the consequences of a previouslyevaluated accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Theproposed change does not introduce any new equipment nor does it requireany existing equipment or systems to perform a different type of functionthan they are currently designed to perform. No Technical Specificationoperating limits are affected by this change. Therefore, the proposed amendmentdoes not significantly increase the consequences of a previously evaluatedaccident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The intent of the gross radioactivity determinationrequired by Technical Specification Table 4.4-4, Item 1 is to verify thatRCS liquid specific activity is maintained within the specific activitylimits of Technical Specification 3.4.8.b. These limits were establishedto maintain doses at the site boundary below 10 CFR 100 guidelines in theevent of a steam generator tube rupture accident. For the purposes of thisdetermination, RCS gaseous activity is insignificant when compared to overallRCS liquid activity. Therefore, elimination of gaseous activity determinationdoes not affect the adequacy of the proposed analysis. This conclusionwas supported by the performance of both the existing analysis and theproposed analysis on RCS liquid samples. The specific activities determinedby these analyses were on the same order of magnitude. A degradation offuel performance would be readily detectable by an increase in the sample'snon-gaseous fission products. As such, the proposed analysis accomplishesthe intent of the gross radioactivity determination and does not resultin a significant reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG>The licensee has concluded that the proposed amendment meets the threestandards in 10 CFR 50.92 and, therefore, involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The NRC staff has made a preliminary review of the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination and agrees with the licensee's analysis.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Cameron Village RegionalLibrary, 1930 Clark Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27605. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-324, BrunswickSteam Electric Plant, Unit 2, Brunswick County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>June 9, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment will change theMinimum Critical Power Ratio (MCPR) safety limit from 1.04 to 1.06. Thechange is necessary because a new fuel type (GE8x8NB) is being added tothe core. The amendment will also specify the fuel types located in the core forthe upcoming cycle. Fuel type GE8x8NB will be added and fuel types 8x8Rand P8x8R will be deleted. Fuel type GE8 will be renamed as fuel type GE8x8EB.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a nosignificant hazard consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Aproposed amendment to an operating license involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee provided the following analysis to support a no significanthazards consideration determination for the MCPR change: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The NRC accepted methodology used to derive the updated safetylimit MCPR of 1.06 applies the same criteria as that used to derive thecurrent safety limit MCPR value of 1.04. The updated safety limit MCPRvalue of 1.06 assures that fuel cladding protection equivalent to thatprovided with the safety limit MCPR value of 1.04 is maintained. Thus,the consequences of accidents previously evaluated are not significantlyincreased. The safety limit MCPR does not affect any physical system orequipment which could change the probability of an accident. Therefore,the proposed amendment does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityof an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Adoption of the proposed MCPR safety limit value does not affectthe function of any component or system. Therefore, the proposed amendmentdoes not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The safety limit MCPR value is determined for cycle specific applicationof fuel types as described in NEDE-24011-P-A, ``General Electrical StandardApplication for Reactor Fuel,'' to meet Criterion 10 of 10CFR50, AppendixA. Analyses of the limiting anticipated operational occurrences for eachcycle are used in conjunction with the applicable safety limit MCPR valueto determine cycle specific operating limit MCPR values. Use of the 1.06safety limit MCPR for Cycle 9 will result in equivalent fuel cladding protectionas that provided with the current cycle limit of 1.04. Therefore, the proposedamendment does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety.</ITAG>The licensee has concluded that the proposed amendment meets the threestandards in 10 CFR 50.92 and, therefore, involves no significant hazardsconsiderations. The Commission has also provided examples of amendments that are considerednot likely to involve significant hazards considerations (see 51 FR 7744).One such example, (i) is a purely administrative change to technical specifications,for example, a change to achieve consistency throughout the technical specifications,correction of an error, or a change in nomenclature. The part of the amendmentrequest which lists the fuel types for the upcoming cycle comes under thisexample. The NRC staff has made a preliminary review of the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination and agrees with the licensee's analysis.In addition, specifying the fuel types for the upcoming cycle is one exampleof a change not likely to involve significant hazards considerations. Accordingly,the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendment doesnot involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P. O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">The Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company, Duquesne Light Company,Ohio Edison Company, Pennsylvania Power Company, Toledo Edison Company,Docket No. 50-440, Perry Nuclear Power Plant, Unit No. 1, Lake County,Ohio </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 26, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would revise paragraph4 of attachment 2 to the Facility Operating License to clarify the requirementsfor conducting air-roll tests of the Transamerica Delaval, Inc. (TDI) dieselgenerators. Under the proposed amendment, if one diesel generator is inoperable,any demonstration of operability of the second diesel shall not be precededor followed by air roll tests until the first diesel generator is declaredoperable. The amendment would also add reference to the latest date ofissuance of a supplemental Safety Evaluation (July 8, 1986) relating todiesel generator maintenance and surveillance programs. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new of different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated, or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The proposed wording change to the license requirement regarding conductof air-roll testing of the TDI-manufactured standby diesel generators doesnot adversely affect the design or safety function of any system or componentrelied upon for prevention or mitigation of previously analyzed accidents.This administrative change to a routine inspection requirement will increasethe availability of a safety system for response to analyzed accidents,since a restriction is being added so that both diesels will no longerbe purposely taken out of service at the same time. The change of the referencedate for the NRC staff Safety Evaluation letter is purely an administrativechange that has previously been reviewed and approved by the NRC stafffor the Perry Nuclear Power Plant. Therefore, the proposed changes do notinvolve a significant increase in the probability of occurrence or consequencesof any accident previously evaluated. The proposed change to the air-roll requirement does not alter the designof any system or component which could affect plant safety or operation.Neither does the proposed change alter the safety function of the dieselgenerators. The diesels and their associated air systems are designed solelyto mitigate plant transients, and performance (or non-performance) of anair-roll on the diesel cannot cause challenges to plant systems that wouldinitiate any such transient. The change of the reference date for the NRCstaff Safety Evaluation letter is purely an administrative change thathas previously been reviewed and approved by the NRC staff for PNPP. Consequently,the proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The license requirement to perform an air-roll test prior to and followingplanned diesel operation is an augmented inspection designed to detectthe unlikely occurrence of cylinder head cracking prior to and followingroutine maintenance/surveillance related diesel operation. The proposedchange would not affect the automatic capabilities of the diesel, nor wouldit alter the performance of the augmented inspection unless another dieselis already inoperable. The proposed change would increase the availabilityof the remaining Standby Diesel Generator when another diesel is alreadyinoperable. In this case, the availability of the remaining diesel is increasedwhich tends to increase the plant's margin of safety. The change of thereference date for the NRC staff Safety Evaluation letter is purely anadministrative change that has previously been reviewed and approved bythe NRC staff for PNPP. Therefore, there is no change to the margin ofsafety for this administrative change. Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendmentinvolves no significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Perry Public Library, 3753Main Street, Perry, Ohio 44081. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Jay Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsandamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John N. Hannon. <ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-454 and 50-455, ByronNuclear Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Ogle County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>May 24, 1989 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>These amendments would changeTechnical Specification (TS) 3/4.7.5 to utilize the seismic qualificationof the deep well pumps to enable use of a deep well pump instead of anessential service water pump. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The staff has evaluated this proposed amendment and determined thatit involves no significant hazards consideration. According to 10 CFR 50.92(c),a proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequence ofan accident previously evaluated; or 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated; or 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed amendment involves several changes: The first three changes are administrative. The word ``each'' was deletedfrom TS 3.7.5 and Limiting Conditions for Operations (LCO) 3.7.5 a. andc. were revised to reflect this deletion. The fourth change changes LCO 3.7.5 Action c. to allow continued operationwith an inoperable essential service water pump as long as the same train'sdeep well pump is operable with it's basin level verified every 2 hoursto be at least 82%. The provisions of TS 3.0.4 do not apply to this Action.The fifth change deleted LCO 3.7.5 e. and Action e. which specified surveillancefor Rock River level and flow whenever the Rock River level is less than670.6 Feet Mean Sea Level (MSL). (This same surveillance is now in theproposed LCO 3.7.5 g. and Action g.). Also, the requirement has been deletedto, within 1 hour, notify the NRC of contingency plans to ensure an adequatesupply of cooling water. The sixth change divides LCO 3.7.5 f. and its Action f. into three items,items f, g, and h. Item f, discusses actions to be taken if the NationalWeather Service (NWS) forecasts that the Rock River level will exceed 702.0feet MSL. Item g discusses actions to be taken if the Rock River waterlevel is not above 670.6 feet MSL. Item h discusses actions to be takenif the NWS issues a tornado watch for the Byron site. The seventh change revises the Bases Section 3/4.7.5 to reflect the changemade in TS 3.7.5. The eighth change deletes Surveillance f. which had required that the deepwell pumps be run immediately prior to declaring them operable. The following analysis of the proposed changes for the evaluation of thesignificant hazards consideration address the eight items from above. <ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequence ofan accident previously evaluated.</T3> </ITAG>Changes (1), (2), and (3) and (7) are administrative in nature and do notinvolve a significant increase in the probability or consequence of anaccident previously evaluated. Change (4) allows two essential service water pumps, or two deep well pumps,or one essential service water pump and one deep well pump to be Operablefor modes 1, 2, 3, 4. There is no significant increase in the probabilityor consequence of an accident previously evaluated since any of the abovemakeup sources are capable of providing redundant makeup to meet the UltimateHeat Sink (UHS) design cooling capability requirements for 30 days followinga LOCA on one unit with the second unit shutting down. The single failurecriteria is met by providing two independent makeup sources. The 72-houraction requirement is unchanged in the event that one of the redundantmakeup sources is inoperable. The basin level is increased to 82% and,a surveillance is initiated every 2 hours thereafter, if a deep well pumpis the redundant operable source of makeup. The increase to 82% compensatesfor the lack of auto makeup and the necessity of manually starting thedeep well pumps to initiate makeup. Calculations show that the basin levelwill be maintained above the level required in the accident analysis ofthe Updated Final Safety Analysis Report (UFSAR). The deep well pumps havebeen shown capable of being the redundant makeup supply in the UFSAR accidentanalysis for flood conditions and a tornado. With the addition of the seismicqualification of the deep well pumps, they meet all conditions as redunduntmakeup sources to the UHS; in particular, for Rock River flow and levelconditions. In the event of a seismic event with Rock River flow less than700 cfs, both deep well pumps meet the single failure criteria in thatone deep well pump has the capacity to meet the design cooling capabilityfor the 30-day period following a LOCA on one unit with the second unitshutting down and to maintain adequate suction to the essential servicewater makeup pumps. LCO 3.7.5c still states ``Two OPERABLE essential servicewater makeup pumps''. Since the deep well pumps are considered the ``backup''makeup sources, in the event the deep well pumps are being used for sometime period as the Operable makeup source, the provisions of Specification3.0.4 would not be applicable provided basin level of at least 82% is beingverified every 2 hours. This is reasonable since all design conditionsand accident analysis in the UFSAR will be provided for by two independentmakeup sources whether these are the essential service water makeup pumpsor deep well pumps or some combination. The change to increase basin levelto at least 82% and verify it every 2 hours provides the UHS with its requiredsupply to account for the manual initiation of deep well pump makeup tothe UHS. Thus basin level is ensured per the design basis accident. Thus,for the reasons above, the change does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated.Changes (5) and (6) are interrelated. The 670.6 feet MSL level is a levelthat ensures a 700 cfs flow water and is essentially an alarm setpointthat requires Rock River flow verification every 12 hours. The 664.7 feetMSL level and the 700 cfs flow limit are minimum values to ensure thatthere will be adequate water levels for essential makeup pump suction inthe event of the postulated failure of the Oregon dam (seismic event).With both deep well pumps Operable and Rock River level less than 670.6feet, the makeup sources would be available even if a seismic event occurredalong with the postulated failure of the Oregon dam. It is only when onewell water pump is inoperable that the Rock River level and flow wouldimpact makeup capability via the essential service water makeup pump ifflow is less than 7000 cfs or level is not greater than 664.7 feet MSLand the dam failed. Thus by deleting LCO 3.7.5e and Action e. and addingthe same Rock River flow and level surveillance requirement to Action g.,the intent of the requirement is satisfied and there involves no significantincrease in the probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated.For change (6), LCO 3.7.5 items f, g, and h and Actions f, g, and h arechanged to allow 1 hour to verify that both deep well pumps are operable.This does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequenceof an accident previously evaluated. The change allows a minimum time toverify deep well pump operability by verifying that the pump is withinits surveillance schedule. The change quantifies a minimum time to verifydeep well pump operability and does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated.For change (6), neither the increase of basin level to at least 82% andthe surveillance every 2 hours involves a significant increase in the probabilityor consequence of an accident previously evaluated. The increased basinlevel and surveillance rather ensure that the UHS design basis accidentheat load will be met with the manual start of the deep well pumps as requiredand the isolation of blowdown. The time to ensure that the OWWO19A andB valves to the UHS are open under all conditions, including loss of off-sitepower and loss of instrument air, has been accounted for in the deep wellpump capability analysis. Thus all design requirements have been met forthe UHS for any accident analyses in the UFSAR. Change (6) proposes that after the deep well pumps are verified to be operable,the provisions of 3.0.4 are not applicable. With the required level increasein the essential service water basin, the verified operability of the deepwell pumps, and the seismic qualification of the deep well pumps, the deepwell pumps are designed for all accident conditions assumed in the UFSAR.Therefore, the provision that 3.0.4 is not applicable does not involvea significant increase in the probability or consequence of an accidentpreviously evaluated. Change (6), which provides the Action to be in Hot Standby within the next6 hours and Cold Shutdown within the following 30 hours instead of HotShutdown in the 6 hours after Hot Standby, is reasonable because in bothcases, Cold Shutdown is achieved within 30 hours. The change allows timeto verify both deep well pumps by restoring one or both to operable statuswithin 1 hour. This change allows subsequent action after 1 hour to shutdown per the Action requirement. The same basin level exists in both theshutdown methods (TS 3.0.3 and the changed Action) to ensure the coolingcapability for the UHS in the unlikely event of the design basis accident.Thus, the change does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of any accident previously evaluated. Change (6) deletes the 1 hour notification of the NRC. This change doesnot involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofany accident previously evaluated. Rather, with the deep well pumps providingmakeup capability to the UHS, both units would be required to shut downas required by the Action requirements if the deep well pumps become inoperable.Change (6) requires both deep well pumps to be operable only when RockRiver flow is less than 700 cfs or level is not at least 664.7 feet MSL,instead of when level is less than 670.6 feet MSL. This is consistent withthe analysis on the Rock River level and flow requirements for adequatesuction to the essential service water makeup pumps in the event of a designbasis seismic event. The essential service water makeup pumps are operableat less than 670.6 feet MSL provided Rock River level is greater than 664.7feet MSL and flow at least 700 cfs. In addition, LCO 3.7.5c and Actionc. ensure makeup to the UHS or require a shutdown. It is for the abovereasons that the change does not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequence of any accident previously evaluated. Thus for all of change (6), there is no significant increase in the probabilityor consequence of any accident previously evaluated. Change (7), which changes the Bases for LCO 3/4.7.5, is administrativeand states that the deep well pumps are seismically qualified. Also, thechange deletes the statement for NRC notification of procedures implementedto meet the GDC 44 for cooling systems. Change (8) deletes a surveillance on the deep well pumps, but since thereis a 31-day surveillance on the deep well pumps that verifies flow, thereis no effect on the capability of the deep well pump to provide the designmakeup flow to the UHS to meet the cooling capability for the design basesaccident. In addition, surveillance i verifies at least 550 gpm flow. Thus, none of the changes involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. <ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Create the possibility of a new of different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated.</T3> </ITAG>Changes (1), (2), (3), and (7) are administrative in nature and do notcreate the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from anyaccident previously evaluated. Change (4) allows operation with redundant makeup sources meeting all designrequirements of the FSAR accident analysis which does not create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident. Change (4) involves a modification to the deep well system. The modificationwill be reviewed and a 10 CFR 50.59 safety evaluation will be performed.The modification would not increase the possibility of a new of differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated and the 10 CFR50.59 safety evaluation would verify this. Any means required to open theOWWO19A and/or B valves as a result of the modification is taken into accountin the analysis of the deep well pump capability to meet the design accidentcooling capability for the UHS. Changes (5) and (6) do not involve the modifications to any system. Changes(5) and (6) ensure that Rock River level and flow surveillances are initiatedas required, and does not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident. Change (6) also ensures that deep well pump operabilityis verified, or Action is taken to shut down. This is consistent with theUFSAR accident analysis that requires the UHS cooling capability for 30days following a LOCA on one unit and shut down on the other. This doesnot create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. Change (8) deletes a surveillance requirement which covered by two othersurveillance. The change does not increase the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Thus, for each of the proposed changes, there is not created the possibilityof new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.<ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.</T3> </ITAG>Change (1), (2), (3), and (7) are administrative in nature and do not affectthe margin of safety. Change (4) revises the Technical Specifications to allow the deep wellpumps to be used as a makeup source to the UHS since the deep well pumpsare a redundant makeup supply capable of meeting the design cooling requirementsof the UHS. The requirement is to remove the heat load from a design basisLOCA on one unit and normal shutdown on the other unit. In addition, withtwo independent makeup sources available to meet the single failure criteria,Action 3.0.4 is not applicable. The basin level requirement of at least82% and the basin level surveillance requirement every 2 hours ensure thatthe deep well pumps will be manually started to provide makeup to ensurethe basin level meets the 50% level required in LCO 3.7.5a. Changes (5) and (6) satisfy the bases of Technical Specification 3.7.5to ensure that an adequate makeup supply to the UHS is available for thedesign accident. In the event of a seismic event with both deep well pumpsoperable, it ensures that makeup to the UHS will meet design requirementsper the UFSAR. Per change (6), when Rock River level is less than 670.6feet MSL, the Rock River flow and level will be performed every 12 hoursthereafter to ensure that flow is less than 700 cfs and level is greaterthan 664.7 feet MSL. LCO 3.7.5c ensures that a makeup source to the UHSis operable. With Rock River level not above 700 cfs, both deep well pumpsare required to be operable and the Action requirements reflect this. Withchange (6), all design bases for the UHS are met and in the event of itsdesign bases accident there would be sufficient cooling capacity for 30days. Change (8) deletes surveillance f that is covered by two other surveillances.Thus, none of the changes involves a reduction in the margin of safety.Therefore, based on the above considerations, the staff has determinedthat these changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>The Rockford Public Library,215 N. Wyman Street, Rockford, Illinois 61101. <T3>Attorney to licensee: </T3>Michael Miller, Esquire; Sidley and Austin,One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60603. <T3>NRC Acting Project Director: </T3>Paul C. Shemanski <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, CatawbaNuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 4, 1987, as supplemented December7, 11 and 29, 1987, March 29, May 4 and 18, June 16, July 1, August 8 and24, and December 15, 1988, and June 12, 1989. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldadd a new Technical Specification (TS) 3.7.1.6, a new Surveillance Requirement(SR) 4.7.1.6, and new Bases 3/4.7.1.6 for the steam generator (SG) power-operatedrelief valves (PORVs). The proposed TS will require the operability ofat least three of the four installed SG PORVs, together with their associatedremote manual controls and their safety-related gas supply systems, toensure that reactor decay heat can be dissipated to the atmosphere in theevent of a SG tube rupture and loss of offsite power. The amendments are a partial response to License Conditions 2.C.(16) and2.C.(10) of Catawba Units 1 and 2 Facility Operating Licenses NPF-35 andNPF-52, respectively. The above License Conditions and correspondence relate to two separateconcerns. The first is the SG tube rupture accident analysis which is outsidethe scope of this notice as it does not involve license amendments, andthe second is the proposed amendments for the SG PORVs' operability. Thisnotice only covers the second concern. The acceptability of the SG tuberupture analysis will be addressed by a separate correspondence. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application ofthe standards in 10 CFR 50.92 by providing certain examples (51 FR 7744).One of the examples (ii) of these actions involving no significant hazardsconsideration relates to a change which constitutes an additional limitation,restriction or control not presently included in the TSs. The proposedamendments are similar in nature to the example provided by the Commissionin that they would add a new TS requiring the operability of at least threeof the four installed SG PORVs together with their remote controls andgas supply systems and a new SR and Bases. These additions would introduceadditional controls not presently in the TSs. Therefore, the proposed amendmentswould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Based on the above considerations, the Commission proposes to determinethat the proposed amendments involve no significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>York County Library, 138East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, CatawbaNuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>March 11, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TS) to change Table 3.3-9, RemoteShutdown Monitoring Instrumentation. Specifically, this change will clarify that there are two readout locationsfor steam generator pressure, steam generator level and auxiliary feedwaterflow rate. The locations are the Auxiliary Shutdown Panels and the AuxiliaryFeedwater Pump Turbine Control Panel. These pressure, level and flow rate readouts are supplied from the samepressure, level and flow rate sensors and provide the same informationto the two separate locations. Therefore, both readout locations shouldbe listed on the Table. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided certain examples (51 FR 7744) of actionslikely to involve no significant hazards considerations. The proposed changesdo not match the examples. However, the staff has reviewed the licensee'srequest for amendments and has determined that should this request be implemented,it would not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated. The proposed change does not affect plantoperations, but instead clarifies the current TS. (2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes do not modify theplant's configuration or operation. Nothing would be added or removed thatwould conceivably introduce a new or different kind of accident mechanismor initiating circumstance than those previously evaluated. (3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. With the proposedchanges, all safety criteria previously evaluated are still met, remainconservative and still maintain the same margin of safety. Accordingly,the Commission proposes to find that the changes do not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>York County Library, 138East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-269, 50-270 and 50-287, OconeeNuclear Station, Units 1, 2 and 3, Oconee County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 9, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TS) to allow, on a one-time basis,inoperability of the Keowee overhead emergency electrical path for 10 days.Oconee Nuclear Station (ONS) is presently upgrading the reliability ofthe 230 kv switchyard by replacing Power Circuit Breakers (PCB) with improvedbreakers. Included in this program is PCB-9. PCB-9 is required for operabilityof the overhead emergency power path pursuant to TS 3.7.1(b)(2). The replacement of PCB-9 would require the overhead emergency path to beinoperable for 10 days. The existing TS provide an allowable outage timeof 72 hours for PCB-9. The proposed amendments would allow completion ofthe change out of PCB-9 without requiring a shutdown of all three units.Risk associated with inoperability of the overhead emergency power pathfor longer than 72 hours has previously been reviewed and found acceptableby the staff. Specifically, TS 3.7.8 establishes a 28 day special inoperabilityperiod for the overhead emergency power path due to Keowee Main Step-upTransformer unavailability. The following restrictions are included withinTS 3.7.8: (a) Prior to heating the reactor above 200 degrees F or prior to the restartof the shutdown reactor or within 72 hours of the loss of the Keowee MainStep-up Transformer, the 4160 volt standby buses shall be energized bya Lee gas turbine through the 100 kV circuit. The Lee gas turbine and 100kV transmission circuit shall be electrically separate from the systemgrid and offsite and non-safety related loads. (b) A Keowee hydro unit shall be connected to the underground feeder circuitand this path shall be verified operable within 1 hour and weekly thereafter.(c) The remaining Keowee Hydro Unit shall be available to the undergroundfeeder circuit. (d) Operating in this mode is restricted to periods not to exceed 28 days,and the provisions of this specification may be utilized without priorNRC approval. The U.S. NRC Regional Office, Region II, will be notifiedwithin 24 hours. The proposed amendments will expand the scope of TS 3.7.8 on a one-timebasis to allow inoperability of the overhead emergency path due to PCB-9unavailability for 10 days. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards (10 CFR Part 50.92(c)) for determiningwhether a significant hazards consideration exists. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.Each accident analysis addressed within the ONS FSAR has been examinedby the licensee with respect to changes proposed within this amendmentrequest. The design basis of the auxiliary electrical systems is to supplythe required engineered safeguards loads of one unit and safe shutdownloads of the other two units and are so arranged that no single failurewill jeopardize plant safety. The applicable design basis accidents (Lossof Electric Power Accidents) are addressed in FSAR Chapter 15.8. Although changes included within this amendment request may involve anincrease in the probability of previously analyzed accidents, the consequencesof the accidents are within the bounds of FSAR analyses. Upon implementationof the modification, the probability of previously analyzed accidents willbe reduced due to the increased fault current interrupting capability ofPCB-9 concurrent with the reduced probability of a unit separation fromthe system grid. As such, the probability of any Design Basis Accident will not be significantlyincreased by this change. Consequences of accident analyses addressed inthe ONS FSAR will not be affected by this change. Inoperability of PCB-9 is functionally equivalent to inoperability of theKeowee Main Step-up Transformer in that it renders the overhead emergencypower path inoperable. Operation of ONS in accordance with these TS willnot create any failure modes not bounded by previously evaluated accidents.Consequently, this change will not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any kind of accident previously evaluated. Risk associated with inoperability of the overhead emergency power pathfor longer than 72 hours has previously been reviewed and found acceptableby the staff with TS 3.7.8. Inoperability of PCB-9 is functionally equivalentto inoperability of the Keowee main step-up transformer. Therefore, operationof ONS in accordance with these TS will not involve a reduction in anymargins of safety. On this basis, the Commission proposes to determine that the proposed amendmentsinvolve no significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Oconee County Library, 501West South Broad Street, Walhalla, South Carolina 29691 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>J. Michael McGarry, III, Bishop, Cook,Purcell and Reynolds, 1200 17th Street, NW., Washington, DC 20036 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>David B. Matthews <ITAG tagnum="84">Louisiana Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-382, Waterford SteamElectric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 12, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications by increasing the quarterly channelcalibrations to monthly on the waste gas holdup system explosive gas monitoringsystem. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance for the application of criteriafor no significant hazards consideration determination by providing examplesof amendments that are considered not likely to involve significant hazardsconsiderations (51 FR 7751). One of these examples (ii) is a change thatconstitutes an additional limitation, restriction, or control not presentlyincluded in the technical specifications; for example, more stringent surveillancerequirement. The proposed amendment is directly related to this examplein that the current channel calibration of the oxygen and hydrogen monitorsis required quarterly or every three months and the licensee proposes toperform the calibration every month. The current system is being replacedwith a new and more reliable system but to meet the manufacturer's recommendations,the functional and calibration testing should be performed monthly. Theamendment will make the Technical Specification requirement and the vendorrecommendation consistent resulting in a more stringent surveillance requirement.Based on the above, the staff proposes to determine that the change doesnot involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>University of New OrleansLibrary, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Bruce W. Churchill, Esq., Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N St., NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Frederick J. Hebdon <ITAG tagnum="84">Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-387 SusquehannaSteam Electric Station, Unit 1, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 12, 1989 as revised June 22,1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>Proposed amendment would changethe Susquehanna Steam Electric Station (SSES) Unit 1 Technical Specificationsto incorporate the Commission's interim requirements as outlined in Bulletin88-07, Supplement 1, ``Power Oscillations in Boiling Water Reactors (BWRs),''and clarify the requirements of certain Actions and Surveillances. Specifically, the licensee has requested the following changes: (1) changes to specification 3/4.4.1.1.1 to replace the existing stabilitycontrols on two loop operations with those recommended in Bulletin 88-07,Supplement 1; (2) changes to specification 3/4.4.1.1.2 to replace the existing stabilitycontrols on single loop operations with those specified in Bulletin 88-07,Supplement 1; (3) changes to specification 3.4.1.4 to revise Action a to clarify thethermal power/core flow condition where an idle recirculation loop canbe started; and (4) a change to Figure 3.4.1.1.1-1 related to ``Thermal Power Restrictions.''<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The staff has reviewed the licensee's request and concurs with the followingbasis and conclusion provided by the licensee in its April 12, 1989 submittal.The following three questions are addressed below for each of the proposedTechnical Specification changes: <ITAG tagnum="21">I. Does the proposed change involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. Does the proposed change create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. Does the proposed change involve a significant reduction in amargin of safety? </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">andbullet; Specification 3/4.4.1.1.1, Recirculation Loops - Two LoopOperation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This specification has been revised to replace the existing stabilitycontrols on the recirculation system with (at a minimum) those recommendedin NRC Bulletin 88-07, Supplement 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. No. The changes to the LCO provide the appropriate limits to ensurethat proper actions are taken if SSES Unit 1 is operating in a region ofthe power/flow map where an instability is more likely to occur. The boundariesof these regions are based upon NRC approved limits for ANF methodology.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Action a is deleted as an editorial change; its purpose as a crossreference is adequately covered by the Applicability sections for the two-loopand single-loop specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Action a.1 requires when operating in Operational Condition 1an immediate manual scram if operation in natural circulation occurs, ifRegion I of the new Figure ``Thermal Power Restrictions'' is entered, ifpower range monitoring instrumentation exhibits evidence of instabilityor if Region II of the Figure is entered and inadequate instability monitoringcapability is available. These actions will ensure that the MCPR SafetyLimit is not violated, so that an increase in the consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated will not occur. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Action a.2 requires immediate exit of Region II if entered. This isconsistent with the Bulletin, and does not require an immediate scram becauseno indications of power oscillation have occurred. Action a.3 is providedsimply to avoid entry into Specification 3.0.3 should new Surveillance4.4.1.1.1.4 be failed. It is not appropriate for any more restrictive requirementsto be applied to these alarms when the unit is operating outside RegionsI and II. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Action b reflects the current requirements associated with naturalcirculation operation in Operational Condition 2 and clarifies that a recirculationloop may be attempted to be returned to service during the allowed outagetime. This change is an administrative clarification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Actions c and d incorporate actions that previously appeared asSurveillance Requirements. This transfer is proposed in order to avoidinvoking Specification 3.0.3 due to the lack of a specific action if thepump discharge or bypass valves failed. These ``new'' actions and the associateddeletion of Surveillance Requirement 4.4.1.1.1.1 are entirely administrativein nature. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Footnote ``+'' was added to clarify that the LPRM upscale alarmsare not required to be operable in Operational Condition 2 since an instabilityevent is not a concern at low power levels. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Existing Surveillance 4.4.1.1.1.4 is deleted since a baseline noiselevel will no longer be used to detect and suppress power oscillations.The new surveillance is provided to ensure operability of the newly requiredLPRM upscale alarms, and frequencies of testing were chosen based on NRCapproved methods for determining surveillance intervals for similar instrumentation(ref. GE NEDC 30851P-A). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Based on the above, none of the proposed changes involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The stability related changes are consistent with current NRC guidanceand approved analytical methods where applicable, and the transferringof certain surveillances to actions will preclude unnecessary shutdownsdue to Specification 3.0.3. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. No. The proposed changes relating to stability use the currentguidance contained in NRC Bulletin 88-07 Supplement 1, which will ensurethat a new or different kind of event will not occur. They accomplish thisby requiring reactor scrams in unstable regions and additional instabilitydetection capability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The editorial changes shifting Surveillance Requirements to Actionscannot create a new event. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. No. See I above. The stability changes are designed to protectthe margin of safety to the MCPR Safety Limit. The editorial changes improvesafety margin by precluding unnecessary plant shutdowns. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">andbullet; Specification 3/4.4.1.1.2, Recirculation Loops - Single LoopOperation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This specification has been revised to replace the existing stabilitycontrols on the recirculation system with (at a minimum) those recommendedin NRC Bulletin 88-07, Supplement 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. No. The changes to the LCO provide the appropriate limits to ensurethat proper actions are taken if SSES Unit 1 is operating in a region ofthe power/flow map where an instability is more likely to occur. The boundariesof these regions are based upon NRC approved limits for ANF methodology.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Action a is deleted as an editorial change; its purpose as a crossreference is adequately covered by the new Actions a and b. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Action a.1 requires an immediate manual scram when operating inOperational Condition 1 if operation in natural circulation occurs, ifRegion I of the new Figure ``Thermal Power Restrictions'' is entered, ifpower range monitoring instrumentation exhibits evidence of instability,or if Region II of the Figure is entered and inadequate instability monitoringcapability is available. These actions will ensure that the MCPR SafetyLimit is not violated, so that an increase in the consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated will not occur. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Action a.2 requires immediate exit of Region II if entered. This isconsistent with the Bulletin, and does not require an immediate scram simplybecause no indications of power oscillation have occurred. This actiondoes not allow the start of a recirculation loop to exit Region II. Actiona.3 is provided simply to avoid entry into Specification 3.0.3 should newSurveillance 4.4.1.1.2.2 be failed. It is not appropriate for any morerestrictive requirements to be applied to these alarms when the unit isoperating outside Regions I and II. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Action b reflects the current requirements associated with naturalcirculation operation in Operational Condition 2. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Actions e and f incorporate actions that previously appeared asSurveillance Requirements. This transfer is proposed in order to avoidinvoking Specification 3.0.3 due to the lack of a specific action if thepump discharge bypass valves failed. These ``new'' actions and the associateddeletion of Surveillance Requirements 4.4.1.1.2.6 and 4.4.1.1.2.8 are entirelyadministrative in nature. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">New Footnote ``+'' was added to clarify that the LPRM upscale alarmsare not required to be operable in Operational Condition 2 since an instabilityevent is not a concern at low power levels. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The revision to existing Action b is purely editorial in nature. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Existing Actions c and e and Surveillance 4.4.1.1.2.2 are deletedsince a baseline noise level will no longer be used to detect and suppresspower oscillation. The new actions and surveillance is provided to ensureoperability of the newly required LPRM upscale alarms, and frequenciesof testing were chosen based on NRC approved methods for determining surveillanceintervals for similar instrumentation (ref. GE NEDC 30851P-A). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Based on the above, none of the proposed changes involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The stability related changes are consistent with current NRC guidanceand approved analytical methods where applicable, and the transferringof certain surveillances to actions will preclude unnecessary shutdownsdue to Specification 3.0.3. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. No. The proposed changes relating to stability use the currentguidance contained in NRC Bulletin 88-07 Supplement 1 to ensure that anunanalyzed event will not occur. They accomplish this by requiring reactorscrams in unstable regions, additional instability detection capability,and precluding a recirculation pump start during single loop operationin a potentially unstable region of the power/flow map. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The editorial changes shifting Surveillance Requirements to Actionscannot create a new event. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. No. See I above. The stability changes are designed to protectthe margin of safety to the MCPR Safety Limit. The editorial changes improvesafety margin by precluding unnecessary plant shutdowns. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">andbullet; Specification 3.4.1.4, Idle Recirculation Loop Startup </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Action a has been revised to clarify the thermal power/core flow conditionwhere an idle recirculation loop can be started. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. No. This requirement is consistent with new Action a.2 of Specification3.4.1.1.2, Single Loop Operation, which was reviewed above. The requirementto preclude a recirculation pump start in a potentially unstable regionof the power/flow map will ensure that a new or different kind of eventwill not occur, and is consistent with the guidance in NRC Bulletin 88-07Supplement 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. No. See I above. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. No. See I above. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">andbullet; Change to Figure 3.4.1.1.1-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. No. The proposed change does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The decay ratios used to develop the proposed changes to the Figure werecalculated with NRC approved methods. None of the actions required uponentry into Region I or II are proposed to be changed from the proposalsubmitted in Reference 1. Therefore, the actions based upon informationin the figure will still ensure that the MCPR Safety Limit is not violated.Based on the above, the proposed revision to Figure 3.4.1.1.1-1 does notinvolve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of anaccident previously evaluate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. No. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Therevision to the figure is consistent with NRC guidance which is specificallydesigned to ensure that a new event involving a reactor core instabilityevent will not occur. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. No. The proposed change does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. This change will continue to protect, as statedin Reference 1, the margin of safety to the MCPR Safety Limit. This revisionto Reference 1 ensures that the Region I and Region II boundaries whichprovide that protection are appropriate for U1C5 based on new informationwhich allowed a larger region of operation. Further steps were taken toconservatively extrapolate these boundaries to rated powers, thereby providinglimits which will not have to change in response to future changes in thedrive flow/core flow relationship. Based on the above, the proposed revisionto Figure 3.4.1.1.1-1 will not involve a reduction in a margin of safety.</ITAG>Based on the above considerations, the Commission proposes to determinethat the proposed changes involve no significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Osterhout Free Library, ReferenceDepartment, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Jay Silberg, Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street NW., Washington, DC 20037 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 26, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TSs) to correct various administrativeerrors. The proposed TS changes are discussed in three groupings: (1) correctionsof grammar and page headings, (2) elimination of notes which no longerapply, and (3) correction of transcription errors with respect to componentdesignations and setpoints. There are 44 pages affected by Group 1 changes(including 12 index pages), 14 pages affected by Group 2 changes and 22pages affected by Group 3 changes. On some pages, the licensee has proposedmultiple changes (e.g., on page 3/4 7-28, the description for the locationof fire hose stations is being revised from ``west wall'' of Reactor Enclosureto ``SW Corner'' of Reactor Enclosure on three elevations to more preciselydesignate the physical locations of the present fire hose stations). Group 1 items include proposed TS revisions to correct grammatical errors,page headings and subheadings to improve readability. For example, on pagei of the Index, a page heading of ``INDEX'' will be added. On page 3/43-11 the word valve should be plural and therefore an `'s'' is being added.Group 2 items include proposed TS revisions to eliminate notes and clauseswhich no longer apply to Limerick Unit 1. For example, on page 3/4 6-4of the current TS there is a note identified by a double asterisk whichdescribes a test interval extension which expired on May 26, 1986. Thisnote is no longer applicable and can therefore be removed. Group 3 items include correction of transcription errors with respect tocomponent designations and setpoints. The proposed changes will resultin consistency with design documents which correctly represent the componentdesignations and setpoints. For example, on page 3/4 3-81 the current designationHSS-51-1F014A is incorrect and will be corrected to HV-51-10F014A. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards consideration ifoperation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment wouldnot: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or(3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee's analysis contained in their May 26, 1989 letter states thefollowing in response to the three NRC criteria referenced above: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes correct three types of administrative errors:1) grammar, page headings and subheadings, 2) notes which no longer applyand 3) transcription errors with respect to component designations andsetpoints. None of these changes will affect any plant hardware, plantdesign, safety limit settings, or plant system operation, and thereforedo not modify or add any initiating parameters that would significantlyincrease the probability or consequences of any previously analyzed accident.Therefore, the proposed changes will not result in a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As discussed in Item (1) above, the proposed TS changes correct errorsand will provide consistency throughout the TS. The proposed changes donot affect any equipment nor do they involve any potential initiating eventsthat would create any new or different kind of accident. As such, the plantinitial conditions utilized for the design basis accident analyses remainvalid. Therefore, the proposed changes do not create the possibility ofa new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction ina margin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As discussed in (1) above, the proposed changes, which correct errorsand provide consistency throughout the TS, do not affect any equipmentinvolved in potential initiating events or safety limit settings and therefore,do not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's submittal and significant hazardsanalysis and concurs with the licensee's determination as to whether theproposed amendment involves a significant hazards consideration. Therefore,the staff proposes to determine that the proposed amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Power Authority of the State of New York, Docket No. 50-333, JamesA. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant, Oswego, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 31, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TS) to clarify the actions which mustbe taken when operating with the Containment Cooling Mode of the ResidualHeat Removal (RHR) System in a degraded mode. Additional proposed changesimprove the structure and readability of the specifications. The changes would affect pages 115a, 116, and 127 and result in the following:(1) removal of ``Subsystem'' from the heading for Sections 3.5.B and 4.5.B;(2) removal of ``one ESW pump'' from the list of Containment Cooling Modeequipment specified in Sections 3.5.B.1, 4.5.B.1 and the correspondingBases section, since the Emergency Service Water (ESW) System requirementsare addressed by TS Sections 3.11.D and 4.11.D; (3) deletion of Specification3.5.B.2 (and renumbering of the succeeding specifications) since the requirementsrelating to containment cooling would also be applied to containment spray,which negates the need for a separate specification; (4) removal of therequirements for inoperable RHR pump(s) since the requirements are alreadycovered in Sections 3.5.A.3 and 4.5.A.3; (5) more clearly identifying theRHR Service Water (RHRSW) operability test as monthly and the flow ratetest as every three months, which is consistent with similar tests performedon related systems; and (6) addition of a new specification which statesthat reactor operation can continue for seven days with two RHRSW pumpsinoperable and adding of the corresponding surveillance test for the remainingcomponents. The revised wording of the specifications in Sections 3.5.B and 4.5.B wouldalso clarify that all of the remaining components of the containment coolingsubsystems shall be demonstrated operable when the RHRSW system is in adegraded condition. However, for situations involving an inoperable containmentcooling subsystem (e.g., loss of an RHR pump or loss of two associatedRHRSW pumps), only the redundant containment cooling subsystem needs tobe demonstrated operable. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) Create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previouslyevaluated; or (3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The license has evaluated the proposed amendment against the standardsprovided above and has made the following determination: <ITAG tagnum="21">Operation of the James A. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant in accordancewith the proposed amendment would not involve a significant hazards considerationas defined in 10 CFR 50.92 since it would not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes conservativelyclarify the containment cooling action requirements and surveillance requirements;thus, providing greater assurances that the full complement of containmentcooling capability will be available in the event of a loss-of-coolantaccident. These changes are administrative in nature and do not involvemodification of any existing equipment, systems, or components; nor dothey relax any administrative controls or limitations imposed on existingplant equipment. Implementation of these changes will require only minorrevisions to the plant's procedures to reflect the technical specificationchanges. No changes to the surveillance testing program are required. Theseproposed changes to the Technical Specifications can not alter the conclusionsof the plant's accident analyses or radiological release analyses as documentedin the FSAR [Final Safety Analysis Report] or the NRC staff's SER [SafetyEvaluation Report]. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. Each of the proposed changes are purelyadministrative in nature. They clarify the intent of the Technical Specifications,improve the consistency within the Technical Specifications, and providea more conservative interpretation of the containment cooling action times.They do not involve modification to any of the plant's systems, equipment,or components; nor do they place the plant in an unanalyzed configuration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The changesare administrative in nature and do not reduce the post-LOCA [Loss of CoolantAccident] heat removal capability of the containment cooling mode of RHR[Residual Heat Removal System]. The proposed changes do not involve modificationto any of the plant's systems, equipment, or components; nor do they affectthe containment cooling subsystem's design basis, performance capability,or NPSH [Net Positive Suction Head] requirements. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination. Based on the review and the above discussion, the staffproposes to determine that the proposed changes do not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>State University of New York,Penfield Library, Reference and Documents Department, Oswego, New York13126. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Charles M. Pratt, 10 Columbus Circle,New York, New York 10019. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Power Authority of the State of New York, Docket No. 50-333, JamesA. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant, Oswego, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 14, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldupdate the suppression chamber water temperature instrumentation in Table3.2-6, ``Surveillance Instrumentation,'' to reflect modifications installedto meet Regulatory Guide 1.97. Specifically the amendment would: (1) changethe ranges of the suppression chamber temperature recorders from 50 - 350anddegrees;F and the ranges of the indicators from 50 - 250anddegrees; F so that eachrange is 30 - 230anddegrees; F; (2) change the number of channels providedby design from four to two; and (3) change the minimum number of operableinstrument channels from two to one. Thus, the change would reflect theupgrade from four instrument channels (with each channel consisting ofa single temperature element and either an indicator in the Control Roomor a recorder in the relay room) to two independent channels (with eachchannel connected to 16 temperature elements) consisting of one indicatorand one recorder per channel. The consequence, therefore, would be to redefineand correct the meaning of the term ``channel'' to reflect this separation.Also, the number of channels provided by design and the minimum numberof operable instrument channels specified for the suppression chamber watertemperature would be consistent with the number of channels specified inthe table for the drywell pressure instruments. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has evaluated the proposed amendment against the standardsprovided above and has made the following determination: <ITAG tagnum="21">Operation of the James A. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant in accordancewith this proposed amendment would not involve a significant hazards consideration,as defined in 10 CFR 50.92, since the proposed changes would not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The changes update Table 3.2-6 toaccurately reflect a plant modification. The changes do not impact theplant's accident analyses as documented in the FSAR [Final Safety AnalysisReport] or the NRC staff's SER [Safety Evaluation Report]. The peak temperaturefor these analyses are bounded by the new temperature range. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromthose previously evaluated. The suppression chamber temperature monitoringsystem does not perform any automatic functions. The revised temperaturerange provides sufficient information to the control room operators toprevent and mitigate the consequences of reactor accidents. The TechnicalSpecification requirements for two temperature indicators and two temperaturerecorders are unchanged by this amendment package. The changes do not createany new failure modes; nor do they allow plant operation in an unanalyzedcondition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The changesdo not relax any administrative controls or limitations. The changes updatethe suppression chamber water temperature instrumentation in accordancewith Regulatory Guide 1.97. There is no change to the safety margin sincethe new temperature range encompasses the analytical temperatures establishedby the plant's safety analyses. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination. Based on the review and the above discussion, the staffproposes to determine that the proposed changes do not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>State University of New York,Penfield Library, Reference and Documents Department, Oswego, New York13126. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Charles M. Pratt, 10 Columbus Circle,New York, New York 10019. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Power Authority of the State of New York, Docket No. 50-333, JamesA. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant, Oswego, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 14, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldcorrect Technical Specifications (TS) Table 3.2-6, ``Surveillance Instrumentation,''to indicate that the total number of reactor pressure instruments providedby plant design is three, rather than the present five indicated in thetable. This change would make the table consistent with plant design andcorrect an error introduced in Amendment 48 which inadvertently identifiedthe total number of recorders and indicators as the number of channelsavailable by design. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has evaluated the proposed amendment against the standardsprovided above and has made the following determination: <ITAG tagnum="21">Operation of the James A. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant in accordancewith the proposed amendment would not involve a significant hazards considerationas defined in 10 CFR 50.92, since it would not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change is purely administrativein nature and corrects an error introduced in Amendment 48 to the TechnicalSpecifications. There are no changes to setpoints, safety limits, surveillancerequirements, or limiting conditions for operation. The change does notimpact previously evaluated accidents; nor does it affect safe plant operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromthose previously evaluated. The proposed change is purely administrativein nature and corrects the Technical Specifications. The change does notinvolve modification to any of the plant's systems, equipment, or components;nor does it allow the plant to operate in an unanalyzed condition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposedchange is purely administrative in nature. The change corrects the numberof instrument channels which are available (by design) to satisfy the requirementsof having two operable reactor pressure instrument channels. The changedoes not involve any plant modifications, nor does it affect the FSAR [FinalSafety Analysis Report] information regarding reactor vessel instrumentation.The number of instrument channels associated with monitoring reactor pressureis not reduced by this proposed amendment. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination. Based on the review and the above discussion, the staffproposes to determine that the proposed changes do not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>State University of New York,Penfield Library, Reference and Documents Department, Oswego, New York13126. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Mr. Charles M. Pratt, 10 Columbus Circle,New York, New York 10019. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Robert A. Capra <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket No. 50-354, HopeCreek Generating Station, Salem County, New Jersey </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>February 27, 1989 and supplementedon April 3, 1989. <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>Changes the Technical Specificationsto add clarification and consistency to the refueling specifications withrespect to reference measurements, load setpoints and travel limits whichwill, in turn, permit control rods to be transported in a vertical position.In addition, the minimum allowable Source Range Monitor (SRM) count rateis increased to agree with SRM requirements imposed elsewhere in the specifications.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards determination: </T3>The Commissionhas provided standards for determining whether a significant hazards considerationexists (10 CFR 50.92(c)). A proposed amendment to an operating licensefor a facility involves no significant hazards consideration if operationof the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would not (1)involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of anaccident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3) involvea significant reduction in a margin of safety. In accordance with 10 CFR50.92 the licensee has reviewed the proposed changes and has concludedas follows that they do not involve a significant hazards consideration:<ITAG tagnum="21">Significant Hazards Consideration Evaluation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The operation of Hope Creek Generating Station (HCGS) in accordancewith the proposed change will not involve a significant increase in theprobability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed amendment does not involve a change to any structure,component or system that affects the probability of any accident previouslyevaluated in the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report (UFSAR). The consequencesof all previously evaluated accidents have been analyzed and the followingconclusions have been reached: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The changes to TS 3.9.1.b.3 and 3.9.6 clarify the use of the mainhoist as the only hoist permitted for fuel movement within the reactorpressure vessel (RPV). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The change to TS 4.9.6.1.b does not allow a fuel bundle to belifted any higher than previously permitted and adds a minimum height-hoistedtolerance to ensure that a bundle will have adequate clearance over thefuel transfer chute floor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The requested change to TS 4.9.6.1.d does raise the setpoint atwhich the fuel-loaded rod block is actuated, however, the setpoint remainsbelow the redundant interlock setpoint of 550 pounds and at a value conservativelyless than the weight of a fuel bundle; therefore, the basis for the fuel-loadedrod block (to ensure no control rod is removed while fuel is being handled)remains satisfied. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The change to 4.9.6.2.b and 4.9.6.3.b raises, by approximatelytwo feet, the height to which a control rod assembly can be lifted by theauxiliary hoists; however, this height remains conservatively within theanalysis for a fuel handling (bundle drop) accident. Additionally, thecalculated radiation dose rate (3.6 mr/hr <T3>at </T3>the surface of the water in the refueling cavity) from a controlrod withdrawn to the amendment requested height will remain less than thecalculated dose rate from a fuel bundle withdrawn to its current uptravellimit by the main hoist (7.6 mr/hr <T3>one foot above </T3>the surface of the water in the refueling cavity).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) The elimination of the fuel loaded rod block interlock for themonorail and frame-mounted auxiliary hoists does not impact an evaluatedaccident. The rod block is unnecessary for these two auxiliary hoists becausethey are specifically precluded from lifting any fuel bundle by the wordingof the proposed TS 3.9.6, by procedure, and by the overload cutoff limitsof TS 4.9.6.b. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) The revision to 4.9.2.c and its associated footnote adds conservatismby ensuring at least 3 cps on the SRMs regardless of signal-to-noise ratios.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The operation of Hope Creek Generating Station (HCGS) in accordancewith the proposed change will not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The changes proposed in the measurement point of reference and theassociated dimensional revision to the uptravel limit setpoint for fuelbundles do not introduce any actual change in uptravel limits. Fuel bundleswill be hoisted to the same height as the present TS permits. The changeto the height to which a control rod may be lifted is within the boundsof the present UFSAR analysis for a fuel bundle lifted to its permittedlimit - considering both a dropped fuel bundle accident and radiologicaldose rate at the refueling platform. There is no new accident considerationintroduced by combining the surveillance requirements for the frame-mountedand monorail mounted auxiliary hoists since the previous TS requirementswere identical for each. Eliminating the fuel-loaded rod block for thesetwo hoists eliminates a surveillance requirement which is meaningless sincethe hoists are not permitted to handle fuel bundles. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The revision to 4.9.2.c and its associated footnote is more conservative,requiring the higher 3 cps SRM count rate regardles of signal-to-noiseratio. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The operation of Hope Creek Generating Station (HCGS) in accordancewith the proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in amargin of safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed increase in height to which a control rod may be hoistedis within the bounds of the previous analysis for a fuel bundle drop. Althoughthe calculated radiation dose rate, at the refueling cavity water surface,from a control rod raised to the proposed uptravel limit will be somewhatgreater than the dose rates corresponding to the current uptravel limit,the dose rate will remain well below the levels currently produced by afuel bundle at its uptravel limit. The increase in the setpoint for thefuel-loaded rod block interlock for the main hoist is within the presentsetpoint for the redundant fuel-loaded rod block interlock setpoint. Thefuel-loaded rod block interlock has no safety importance for the auxiliaryhoists since they do not handle fuel bundles. The revision which increasesthe required minimum SRM counts adds to the margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff reviewed the licensee's determination that the proposed licenseamendment involves no significant hazards consideration and agrees withthe licensee's analysis. Accordingly, the staff proposes to determine thatthe proposed license amendment does not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pennsville Public library,190 S. Broadway, Pennsville, New Jersey 08070 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Troy B. Conner, Jr., Esquire, Conner andWetterhahn, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Walter R. Butler <ITAG tagnum="84">South Carolina Electric andamp; Gas Company, South Carolina Public ServiceAuthority, Docket No. 50-395, Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station, Unit No.1, Fairfield County, South Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 22, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The change to the TechnicalSpecifications would: (1) revise Specification 4.0.3 to clarify when amissed surveillance constitutes a violation of the operability requirementsof a Limiting Condition for Operation and to clarify the applicabilityof the action requirements and the time during which the limits apply,and (2) to clarify Specification 4.0.4 for mode changes as a consequenceof action requirements. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a nosignificant hazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c).A proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has concluded with respect to the May 22, 1989 submittal that:(1) the proposed amendment would not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated becausethe proposed changes are designed to resolve the two generic concerns previouslyidentified and addressed by the NRC staff in Generic Letter (GL) 87-09``Section 3.0 and 4.0 of the Standard Technical Specifications (STS) onthe Applicability of Limiting Condition for Operation and SurveillanceRequirements''. The changes proposed in GL 87-09 have been determined bythe staff to result in improved TS. The changes proposed for the VirgilC. Summer Nuclear Station do not affect any of the accidents previouslyevaluated in the safety and analysis report; (2) the proposed amendmentwould not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any accident previously evaluated because the proposed changes donot reflect a change in plant equipment, but resolve inconsistencies andexisting undue restrictions with the TS. The changes were determined bythe NRC staff in GL 87-09 to result in improved TS. The licensee determinedthat the proposed changes would not induce the possibility of an accidentnot previously identified in the safety analysis report; (3) the proposedchanges would not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safetyas defined in the basis to any Technical Specification. These changes resolveinconsistencies and remove undue restrictions from the Technical Specifications.The NRC staff has made a preliminary review of the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination and agrees with the licensee's analysis.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Fairfield County Library,Garden and Washington Streets, Winnsboro, South Carolina 29180 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Randolph R. Mahan, South Carolina Electricand Gas Company, P.O. Box 764, Columbia, South Carolina 29218 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">System Energy Resources, Inc., et al., Docket No. 50-416, Grand GulfNuclear Station, Unit 1, Claiborne County, Mississippi </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>May 8, 1989 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The amendment would change theTechnical Specifications (TS) by changing Table 1.2, Operational Condition,and TS 3/4 9.1, Reactor Mode Switch, to allow the reactor mode switch tobe placed in the refuel position for moving a single control rod with thereactor in Operational Condition 3 (hot shutdown) and Operational Condition4 (cold shutdown). The present TS permit movement of the control rod torecouple it to its drive. The change would allow movement of a single controlrod in Operational Conditions 3 and 4 for additional purposes, such asventing of the control rod drive, timing of the control rod scram and frictiontesting of the control rod. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a nosignificant hazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c).A proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has provided an analysis of no significant hazards considerationsin its request for a license amendment. The licensee's analysis of theproposed amendment against the three standards in 10 CFR 50.92 is reproducedbelow. <ITAG tagnum="21">1. No significant increase in the probability or consequences of anaccident previously evaluated results from this change. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. A single control rod can be withdrawn under control of the reactormode switch refuel position one-rod-out interlock in Operational Conditions3 and 4. Although this change would allow an increase in the frequencyof single control rod withdrawals, the probability of previously analyzedaccidents is not affected. The one-rod-out interlock associated with therefuel position of the reactor mode switch provides protection againstprompt reactivity excursions. This interlock is explicitly assumed in thesafety analysis for control rod removal error during refueling. A promptreactivity excursion could potentially result in fuel failure. The one-rod-outinterlock, together with the requirements for adequate SHUTDOWN MARGINduring refueling, provide protection against prompt reactivity excursionsby preventing withdrawal of more than one control rod and ensuring thecore remains subcritical with any one control rod withdrawn. The additionof surveillance requirements for the one-rod-out interlock will assurethe interlock is operable prior to withdrawal of a control rod in OperationalConditions 3 and 4. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The consequences of previously analyzed accidents in OperationalConditions 3 and 4 are not affected by this proposed change. The SHUTDOWNMARGIN requirements of TS 3.1.1. require the reactor to be subcriticalwhen all control rods are fully inserted except for the single controlrod having the highest reactivity worth being fully withdrawn. The singlefailure proof one-rod-out interlock of the reactor mode switch refuel positionpermits only a single control rod to be withdrawn. The proposed changewill not result in the reactor having the potential for attaining criticalityin Operational Conditions 3 and 4 or affect the initial conditions assumedin any design basis accident analysis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Therefore, the probability and consequences of previously analyzedaccidents are not increased. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. This change would not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any previously analyzed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Single control rods can be withdrawn in Operational Conditions3 and 4 under the existing Technical Specifications to permit control rodrecoupling. The proposed change would merely expand this provision to othercontrol rod maintenance and testing activities performed in OperationalConditions 3 and 4. The withdrawal of individual control rods in OperationalConditions 3 and 4 is a mode of operation permitted by existing TechnicalSpecifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The additional control rod maintenance and testing activities whichcould be performed in Operational Conditions 3 and 4 are permitted by theexisting Technical Specifications in Operational Conditions 1, 2, and 5.Examples of activities which could be performed include venting of controlrods following a reactor scram or control rod drive system outage, normalcontrol rod insertion/withdrawal timing and adjustment, control rod scramtime testing and control rod friction testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Therefore, this change does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. This change would not involve a significant reduction in the marginof safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The one-rod-out interlock of the reactor mode switch refuel positionand the SHUTDOWN MARGIN requirement of TS 3.1.1 ensure the reactor willbe maintained subcritical during single control rod withdrawals. This changewill only permit one control rod to be withdrawn when shutdown. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Therefore, this change will not involve a significant reductionin the margin of safety. </ITAG>The licensee has concluded that the proposed amendment meets the threestandards in 10 CFR 50.92 and, therefore, involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The NRC staff has made a preliminary review of the licensee's no significanthazards consideration determination and agrees with the licensee's analysis.Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that the requested amendmentdoes not involve a significant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Hinds Junior College, McLendonLibrary, Raymond, Mississippi 39154 <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Nicholas S. Reynolds, Esquire, Bishop,Liberman, Cook, Purcell and Reynolds, 1200 17th Street, NW., Washington,DC 20036 <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket No. 50-260, Browns Ferry NuclearPlant, Unit 2, Limestone County, Alabama </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>February 17, 1989 and June 20, 1989(TS 266) <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldcorrect errors in the Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, (BFN), Unit 2, TechnicalSpecifications (TS) as follows: (1) Table 3.2.F (page 3.2/4.2-32), InstrumentNumber (RR-90-322A) - change the instrument number to read RM-90-306 andRR-90-360, correct typographical error in the type Indication and Rangecolumn (correct units from curies per cubic centimeter to microcuries percubic centimeter), delete the Iodine and Particulate indications and range.(2) Notes to Table 3.2.F (pages 3.2/4.2-33) - correct typographical errorsin footnote 7 (change TS 6.7.2 to 6.9.1.4 and 6.7.2 to 6.9.2) and add footnote9 (clarifies the function of subject instrument to Noble gas only); (3)Table 4.2.F item 23 (page 3.2/4.2-55) - correct instrument number and typeto read Wide Range Gaseous Effluent Radiation Monitor and recorder (RM-90-306and RR-90-360); (4) Page 6.0-29 item 6.9.2.10 - correct the word high-rangeto wide-range. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analysis, using standards in Section 50.92, on theissue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequence of any accident previously evaluated. Theproposed changes correct typographical errors and nomenclature, providesconsistency between Table 3.2.F, Notes to Table 3.2.F, and Table 4.2.Fin addition to the other appropriate sections of the TS. These changesare administrative in nature and do not change any safety analysis forwhich BFN is licensed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Removal of the iodine and particulate monitors from Table 3.2.F doesnot significantly increase the probability of an accident. BFN currentlyhas a system installed that meets the NRC requirements of NUREG 0737 itemII.F.1, II.F.2, and Regulatory Guide 1.97. In the event of an accident,BFN has one designed release point, the vent stack. Being in compliancewith the subject NRC requirements, BFN continuously samples the plant gaseouseffluent for postaccident releases of radioactive iodines and particulates.The iodines and particulates are measured through laboratory analysis ofparticulate and carbon filters. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition, a recorder (RR-90-360) is being added to the TS. Thisprovides a retrievable record of what instrument RM-90-306 was monitoring.Adding this recorder serves no safety function nor provides any input signalsto any isolation functions for mitigation of any accident previously evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. This proposedchange does not change any safety related equipment, safety functions,or plant operations. This change does not create any new accident modeor release pathway of radioactive effluents to the environment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The typographical corrections will provide a moreaccurate identification and description for Table 3.2.F, Notes for Table3.2.F, and Table 4.2.F which will assist the plant personnel working withthis equipment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Deletion of the iodine and particulate monitors from Table 3.2.F willnot decrease the margin of safety since BFN will continue to sample andanalyze the subject filters to determine any quantities of particulatesand iodines that may be released. The onsite laboratory equipment, usedby trained technicians in accordance with approved procedures, ensuresthat the analysis can be performed to support the needs of plant and offsitepersonnel in the event of an accident. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The addition of the recorder (RR-90-360) will only provide a meansfor recording gaseous effluents from the vent stack. This will also providea chart record that is retained for historical purposes. Again this recorderdoes not serve any safety related or accident mitigation function. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Athens Public Library, SouthStreet, Athens, Alabama 35611. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket No. 50-260, Browns Ferry NuclearPlant Unit 2, Limestone County, Alabama </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>April 14, 1989 as supplemented by letterdated April 14, 1989 (TS 268). <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed changes would addLicense Condition 2.C.5.(a), add a new Definition Section 1.0.NN, and reviseTechnical Specification (TS), Sections 6.5.1.6, 6.5.2.8 and 6.8.1 for BrownsFerry, Unit 2 (BFN2). These changes will allow BFN2 to implement a NRCapproved Appendix R Safe Shutdown Program, under the controls of the BFN2TS. These changes follow the NRC guidance provided in Generic Letter 86-10.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The proposed amendment does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.Implementation of these technical specifications (TS) provide consistencybetween the operating license, the Appendix R Safe Shutdown Program, andthe BFN Appendix R Safe Shutdown Analysis. These proposed changes are administrativein nature and do not alter the intended function or design basis of anysafety-related equipment as addressed in the BFN Final Safety AnalysisReport (FSAR). Implementation of these changes ensures that the AppendixR Safe Shutdown Program is maintained in a manner consistent with NRC guidance.By maintaining this Program in accordance with the proposed TS, BFN willensure the equipment needed to perform safe shutdown in accordance withthe BFN Appendix R Safe Shutdown Analysis is properly maintained and isfunctional to meet the requirements of 10 CFR 50 Appendix R. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from an accident previously evaluated. Thisis an administrative change which places controls on an approved NRC Program.These changes will not eliminate or modify any protective functions orequipment that are required for BFN to achieve and maintain reactor shutdowncapabilities as required by 10 CFR 50 Appendix R. Implementation of theseproposed changes will not result in an additional release pathway to theenvironment. In developing the BFN Appendix R Safe Shutdown Program ananalysis was performed in order to identify that equipment needed to complywith 10 CFR 50 Appendix R. Implementing this Program and the proposed TSdoes not negate the other safety analyses or accident scenarios in whichBFN was licensed for. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction inthe margin of safety. This proposed amendment is administrative and placesvarious administrative controls on an NRC approved BFN Appendix R SafeShutdown Program. Implementing these changes enhances the overall safetyof BFN. The program identifies that equipment required by the AppendixR Safe Shutdown Analysis to shutdown the reactor in accordance with 10CFR 50 Appendix R. In addition, it also provides testing and monitoringrequirements along with compensatory measures if the subject equipmentcannot fulfill its function. The proposed TS allows BFN to change the Programunder the guidelines of 10 CFR 50.59 which is an approved industry practiceand consistent with NRC Generic Letter 86-10. Any changes made under 10CFR 50.59 are required to be submitted to NRC in an annual report. Thisprocess will enable NRC to independently keep abreast with any changesthat may be made. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Athens Public Library, SouthStreet, Athens, Alabama 35611. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket No. 50-260, Browns Ferry NuclearPlant, Unit 2, Limestone County, Alabama </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>June 20, 1989 (TS 272) <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed changes would adda new Section 3.5/4.5.M to the Browns Ferry, Unit 2 (BFN), Technical Specifications(TS) and would revise the existing Section 3.6/4.6.F. These changes willincorporate more restrictive surveillance requirements and Limiting Conditionsof Operation (LCO) to address reactor core thermal-hydraulic stabilityconsiderations as specified in NRC Bulletin 88-07, Supplement 1 [PowerOscillations in Boiling Water Reactors (BWRs) - December 30, 1988] andGeneral Electric (GE) interim corrective actions provided to all BWR licenseesin November 1988. These proposed changes define the reactor core regionsof operation which are acceptable or unacceptable and provide requiredactions needed to exit operating in an unacceptable region. Specifically,operation in Region I and II as defined in Figure 3.5.M.1 of the proposedTS changes would be restricted. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">(1) This change does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Implementation ofthe proposed TS change decreases the probability of core thermal-hydraulicoscillations by precluding operating conditions where instabilities haveoccurred at other plants. In addition, the proposed change will provideadditional assurance that core oscillations that do occur will be suppressedprior to exceeding fuel integrity limits. The proposed change does nothave any adverse safety effect on any affected safety system nor are theassumptions of the safety analyses affected by restricting operation tooutside of Region I and II. Therefore, the proposed change reduces theprobability and consequences of potential core oscillations and does notincrease the probability or consequences of any other previously analyzedevent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) This proposed change does not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. Restrictingoperation to outside of Region I and II does not create any new failuremechanisms. Plant procedures currently preclude normal operation in thoseregions. Emergency entry into a restricted region is permitted to protectplant safety equipment provided that the prescribed actions (i.e., scramor exit) for the region entered are performed. Operator actions to exitRegion II will be performed in compliance with all plant procedures, fuelpreconditioning restrictions, and technical specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) This change does not involve a significant reduction in a marginto safety. The proposed changes are conservative in nature and provideincreased assurance that the fuel safety limit MCPR will not be violateddue to core oscillations. These changes are consistent with NRC and GEguidelines. The implementation of this tech spec will actually increasethis margin of safety at BFN by not allowing the plant to operate in RegionsI or II. If one of these Regions are entered specific operator actionsare required which will place the plant in a more conservative and safetycondition than current BFN Tech Specs required. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Athens Public Library, SouthStreet, Athens, Alabama 35611. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket No. 50-327, Sequoyah Nuclear Plant,Unit 1, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>June 20, 1989 (TS 89-24) <T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The Tennessee Valley Authority(TVA) proposed to modify the Sequoyah Nuclear Plant (SQN), Unit 1, TechnicalSpecifications (TS). The proposed change is to revise Surveillance Requirement(SR) 4.6.5.1.b.2 to allow a one-time extension of the 12-month ice-weighinginterval for weighing the ice baskets in the ice condenser inside containment.This extension is from December 15, 1989 until the Unit 1 Cycle 4 refuelingoutage, which is scheduled for April to June of 1990. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>TVA provided the following information in its submittal to supportthe proposed change: <ITAG tagnum="21">TVA is requesting an extension of SR 4.6.5.1.b.2 to postpone weighingof ice until the Unit 1 Cycle 4 refueling outage, which is projected tobegan April 1, 1990. The last ice-weight surveillance performed for SQNUnit 1 was completed September 16, 1988. SR 4.6.5.1.b.2 requires that thenext ice-weighing surveillance be performed within 12 months of that date(i.e., September 15, 1989). Applying the provisions of TS 4.0.2 would allowan extension of the surveillance interval by a maximum of 3 months (i.e.,December 15, 1989). TVA is requesting an additional 3-1/2 month extensionto allow the ice-weighing outage to be conducted coincident with the Unit1 Cycle 4 refueling outage. This 3-1/2 month extension would provide increasedplant availability (elimination of a 20- to 30-day mode 5 outage to weighice) and would allow for more efficient use of manpower. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">SR 4.6.5.1.b.2 requires that each basket contain at least 1,200 pounds(lbs) of ice and that the average ice weight for the bay analysis and thegroup-row analysis not be less than 1,200 lbs per basket at a 95 percentlevel of confidence at the start of the surveillance interval. SQN's 1,200-lbTS limit is based on a containment analysis that assumes a 1,080-lb perbasket ice weight. The 1,200-lb per basket TS limit contains a 10 percentconservative allowance for ice loss through sublimination during the intervalbetween weighings and a 1 percent conservative allowance for ice-weighinginstrument error. The TS limit thereby provides a weight-per-basket icebasket ice weight that is more than 11 percent higher than the per basketice weight assumed for the ice condenser design. </ITAG>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis: <ITAG tagnum="21">TVA has evaluated the proposed technical specification change andhas determined that it does not represent a significant hazards considerationbased on criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of SQN [Unit1] in accordance with the proposed amendment will not: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously analyzed. TVA proposes to modify the SQN Unit1 TSs to revise Surveillance Requirement 4.6.5.1.6.2 to allow a one-timeextension of the 12-month ice-weighing interval. The last ice-weight surveillancewas performed September 16, 1988. TVA is requesting a one-time extensionto allow the next ice-weighing to be conducted during the Unit 1 Cycle4 refueling outage that is currently scheduled to begin April 1, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The ice condenser system is provided to absorb [the] thermal energyrelease following a LOCA or HELB [Loss-of-Coolant Accident or High EnergyLine Break] and to limit the peak pressure inside containment. The currentice condenser analysis for SQN is based on a minimum of 1,080 lbs of iceper basket. TVA's calculation shows that for the bay analysis, using thepredicted sublimination rate of 18-1/2 months, all bays would have an averagebasket weight in excess of 1,080 lbs. TVA's calculation shows that forthe group-row analysis using the predicted sublimination rate for 18-1/2months, all group-rows would have an average basket weight above 1,080lbs with the exception of group 3 - row 1. The predicted average basketweight in this region was 1,026 lbs, which is 5 percent low. TVA evaluatedthe impact of the low weight in group 3 - row 1. TVA's evaluation addressedthe potential for and the effects of group 3 - row 1 melting out at a timeearlier than the time assumed in SQN's FSAR containment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Based on TVA's evaluation and the improved surveillance history ofthe SQN ice baskets, TVA considers the distribution of ice to be acceptablefor satisfying the basic safety function of the ice condenser for the proposedone-time extension. The proposed change, therefore, does not involve asignificant increase in the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously evaluated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. TVA's request for a 3-1/2 month extensionof the 12-month ice-weighing interval will not result in a new or differentkind of accident from that previously analyzed in SQN's FSAR. SQN's icecondenser serves to limit the peak pressure inside containment followinga loss of coolant accident (LOCA) or high-energy line break (HELB). TVAhas evaluated SQN's FSAR analysis in conjunction with the preliminary containmentpressure analysis for SQN to show that sufficient ice would be presentduring the requested extension period to keep the peak containment pressurebelow SQN's containment design pressure of 12 psig. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The icecondenser system is provided to absorb [the] thermal energy release followinga LOCA or HELB to limit the peak pressure inside containment. The currentice condenser analysis for SQN is based on a minimum of 1,080 lbs of iceper basket. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">TVA's calculation shows that for the bay analysis, using the predictedsublimination rate of 18-1/2 months, all bays would have an average basketweight in excess of 1,080 lbs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">TVA's calculation shows that for the group-row analysis using thepredicted sublimination rate for 18-1/2 months, all group-rows would havean average basket weight above 1,080 lbs with the exception of group 3- row 1. The predicted average basket weight in this region was 1,026 lbs,which is 5 percent low, TVA evaluated the impact of the low weight in group3 - row 1. TVA's evaluation addressed the potential for and the effectsof a group 3 - row 1 melting out at a time earlier than the time assumedin SQN's FSAR containment analysis. TVA's evaluation shows that the conservatismscontained in SQN's current containment analysis and the results of thepreliminary containment pressure analysis for SQN (i.e., ``WestinghouseLOCA Mass and Energy Release Model for Containment Design - March 1979version,'' WCAP-10325-P-A, May 5, 1983) provide sufficient ice in all regionsof the SQN Unit 1 ice bed to keep the peak containment pressure below 12psig, and to prevent premature burn-through of the ice bed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Based on TVA's evaluation and the improved surveillance history ofthe SQN ice baskets, TVA considers the distribution of ice to be acceptablefor satisfying the basic safety function of the ice condenser for the proposedone-time extension. The proposed change, therefore, does not involve asignificant reduction in the margin of safety. </ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for an amendment involves nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902. <T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black <ITAG tagnum="84">Wisconsin Electric Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-266 and 50-301, PointBeach Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Town of Two Creeks, Manitowoc County,Wisconsin </ITAG><T3>Date of amendments request: </T3>April 26, 1989 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>These proposed amendments wouldclarify the reporting requirements for operation of the Overpressure MitigatingSystem (OMS) and delete two schedular commitments that have been implemented.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendment toan operating license for a facility involves no significant hazards considerationif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee proposes to amend the Technical Specification (TS) 15.6.9.2.Cto clarify the reporting requirements for operation of the OMS by specifyingthat operation of either the pressurizer power operated relief valves inthe low temperature overpressure protection mode or the residual heat removalsystem relief valves be reported to the Commission as required under theUnique Reporting Requirements of the TS. Additionally, the licensee proposesto remove two schedular commitments contained in the footnotes of two TStables. The first schedular commitment is contained in Table 15.3.5-1 andis related to the setting limit for item 10, ``Loss of Voltage.'' Sincethe associated relays have been installed as required, the footnote associatedwith their installation is no longer appropriate. The second schedularcommitment is contained in Table 15.7.4-2 and is related to item 7.a, ``OxygenMonitor.'' The oxygen monitor was installed as required and the footnoteis no longer appropriate. The licensee has determined that the proposedchanges are strictly administrative in nature and involve no physical plantmodifications and no changes in plant operations or procedures. As a result,the licensee concludes that the aforementioned changes to the TS do notinvolve a significant hazards consideration. The staff has reviewed the licensee's evaluation of the proposed amendments,and agrees with the licensee's conclusion. Furthermore, the Commission has provided guidance concerning the applicationof the significant hazards consideration criteria by providing examples(51 FR 7751) of actions that are considered not likely to involve a significanthazards consideration. One of the examples of actions not likely to involvesignificant hazards considerations is (i), a ``purely administrative changeto Technical Specifications....'' All of the changes proposed by the licenseefall within the scope of this example. Therefore the staff proposes todetermine that the proposed changes to the TS do not involve significanthazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Joseph P. Mann Library, 1516Sixteenth Street, Two Rivers, Wisconsin. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsand Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John N. Hannon. <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application complies with the standardsand requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriatefindings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulationsin 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility OperatingLicense and Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determinationand Opportunity for Hearing in connection with these actions was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>as indicated. No request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene was filed following this notice. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationsfor amendments, (2) the amendments, and (3) the Commission's related letters,Safety Evaluations and/or Environmental Assessments as indicated. All ofthese items are available for public inspection at the Commission's PublicDocument Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC,and at the local public document rooms for the particular facilities involved.A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. <ITAG tagnum="84">Arkansas Power andamp; Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-313 and 50-368,Arkansas Nuclear One, Units 1 and 2, Pope County, Arkansas </ITAG><T3>Date of applications for amendment: </T3>April 24, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>These amendments modified theANO-1 and ANO-2 Technical Specifications to reflect planned changes inArkansas Power and Light organization for Arkansas Nuclear One. The amendmentsalso changed the designated members at the Plant Safety Committee (PSC)including the PSC Chairman. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 21, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 21, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>124 and 98 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-6. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 17, 1989 (54 FR 21298). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 21, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>Nos. 124and 98 <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Tomlinson Library, ArkansasTech University, Russellville, Arkansas 72801 <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>June 23, 1987 as revised March29, 1989. Description of amendments: The amendments add surveillance andradioactive release requirements for incinerated oil to the RadiologicalEnvironmental Technical Specifications (RETS). <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 26, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 26, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>134 and 164 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-71 and DPR-62. </T3>Amendmentsrevise the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>The Commission's related evaluation of the amendmentsis contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 26, 1989 <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">The Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company, Duquesne Light Company,Ohio Edison Company, Pennsylvania Power Company, Toledo Edison Company,Docket No. 50-440, Perry Nuclear Power Plant, Unit No. 1, Lake County,Ohio </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 8, 1988 as amended July21, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment makes numerous administrativeand editorial changes, typographical error corrections and title changes.In addition, changes to the size and composition of the Plant OperationsReview Committee (PORC) have been made. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 26, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 26, 1989 <T3>Amendment No. </T3>22 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-58. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 31, 1988 (53 FR 19832) and March 22, 1989(54 FR 11845). The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment iscontained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 26, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Perry Public Library, 3753Main Street, Perry, Ohio 44081 <ITAG tagnum="84">Consumers Power Company, Docket No. 50-255, Palisades Plant, Van BurenCounty, Michigan </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>March 3, 1982, as supplementedby letters dated August 29, 1984, March 21, 1988 and April 20, and May4, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment revises the requirementsdealing with leak rate testing of the containment air lock door seals andthe associated action statement when allowable leakage rate (La) is exceeded.The additional information submitted by letters dated March 21, 1988, April20, and May 4, 1989, served as clarification showing that the provisionsof 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix J are met, and in no way does this additionalinformation invalidate the findings of the proposed no significant hazardsconsideration published on September 21, 1983. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 1, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 1, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>126 <T3>Provisional Operating License No. DPR-20. </T3>The amendment revisesthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>September 21, 1983 (48 FR 43135). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 1, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Van Zoeren Library, HopeCollege, Holland, Michigan 49423. <ITAG tagnum="84">Florida Power Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-302, Crystal RiverUnit No. 3 Nuclear Generating Plant, Citrus County, Florida </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>November 28, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment increases the containmentleakage test pressure from 49.6 psig to 53.3 psig. In addition, surveillances4.6.1.2.d.3 and 4.6.1.2.f, which referred to a seal system that is notused at CR-3, have been deleted. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 22, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 22, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>118 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-72. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 17, 1989 (54 FR 21307). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 22, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>Crystal River Public Library,668 N.W. First Avenue, Crystal River, Florida 32629 <ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-321 and 50-366,Edwin I. Hatch Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Appling County, Georgia </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 3, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments modified the TechnicalSpecifications related to primary containment isolation valves <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 20, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 20, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>164 and 101 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-57 and NPF-5. </T3>Amendments revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 5, 1989 (54 FR 13765). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 20, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Appling County Public Library,301 City Hall Drive, Baxley, Georgia 31513 <ITAG tagnum="84">Gulf States Utilities Company, Docket No. 50-458, River Bend Station,Unit 1 West Feliciana Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>August 5, 1988 as supplemented November30, 1988, January 17 and February 28, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment modified LicenseCondition 2.C(13) and Technical Specification Table 3.3.6-2, Item 1.b,High Power Setpoint, to allow continued operation of the facility withup to 100anddegrees; F reduction from the rated feedwater temperature of420anddegrees; F during the normal fuel cycle. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 23, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 23, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>37 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-47. </T3>The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications and license. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>October 5, 1988 (53 FR 39170). The November30, 1988, January 17 and February 28, 1989 submittals provided clarifyinginformation and did not change the finding of the initial notice or thescope of the amendment request. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in aSafety Evaluation dated June 23, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Government Documents Department,Louisiana State University, Baton Rouge, Louisiana 70803 <ITAG tagnum="84">Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-220, Nine Mile PointNuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Oswego County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>September 22, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>Revises facility Technical Specification3.4.5a to clarify the requirement that the Control Room Air Treatment Systembe operable whenever reactor building integrity is required. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 19, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 19, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>106 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-63: </T3>Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 19, 1989 (54 FR 21311). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 19, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Reference and Documents Department,Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126.<ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 24, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes the MillstoneUnit 3 Technical Specifications (TS), to allow Cycle 3 operation, as follows:(1) TS 3/4.2.2 ``Heat Flux Hot Channel Factor - Four Loops Operating andThree Loops Operating'' would be changed to eliminate the reference tofuel assembly grid locations, (2) TS 5.3.1., ``Fuel Assemblies'' wouldbe changed to properly describe the Cycle 3 fuel assemblies, (3) TS 5.3.2,``Control Rod Assemblies'' would be changed to allow use of silver - indium- cadmium control rods and (4) TS 6.9.1.6, ``Radial Peaking Factor LimitReport'' would be changed to allow submittal of the report prior to eachcycle's initial criticality. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>37 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-49. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 22, 1989 (54 FR 7636). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 28, 1989 <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385. <ITAG tagnum="84">Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, DiabloCanyon Nuclear Power Plant, Units 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>February 28, 1989, as supplementedby letter dated April 27, 1989 (Reference LAR 89-01) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments revised Section6, Administrative Controls, of the Technical Specifications to change therequirements for Plant Staff Review Committee (PSRC) membership, quorum,qualifications, and for the review and approval of procedures, tests, andexperiments. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 22, 1989. <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 22, 1989. <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>41 and 40. <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-80 and DPR-82: </T3>Amendmentschanged the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 3, 1989 (54 FR 18950), as superseded bynotice dated May 17, 1989 (54 FR 21314). The Commission's related evaluationof the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 22, 1989.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>California Polytechnic StateUniversity Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San LuisObispo, California 93407. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>September 14, 1988 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment revised the Unit1 Technical Specifications to increase the minimum level of water thatmust be maintained in the spray pond to support operation of Unit 2. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 16, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Upon issuance of an operating license to LimerickGenerating Station, Unit No. 2. <T3>Amendment No. </T3>25 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-39. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>February 22, 1989 (54 FR 7640). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 16, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 27, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications (TSs) to revise the effluent dose limits to a per site ratherthan a per unit basis. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 19, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Upon issuance of an operating license to LimerickGenerating Station, Unit No. 2. <T3>Amendment No. </T3>26 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-39. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, 1989 (54 FR 9922). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 19, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 10, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications on the Residual Heat Removal Service Water and the EmergencyService Water Systems to reflect operation of Limerick Unit 2. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 20, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Upon issuance of an operating license to LimerickGenerating Station, Unit No. 2. <T3>Amendment No. </T3>27 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-39. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 3, 1989 (54 FR 18953). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 20, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 10, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications to: (1) delete the requirement that the Average Power RangeMonitors be operable when the plant is in the cold shutdown condition,(2) revise the reactor coolant leakage requirements to be similar to theleakage rates in generic letter 88-01, (3) modify the table on minimumshift crew composition to permit the SRO for Unit 1 to serve the same positionfor Unit 2 when Unit 2 is in cold shutdown, being refueled or is defueled,(4) clarify the location of the temperature sensors used to detect leakagefrom the main steam lines, (5) permit snubber surveillance to be performedwhen a unit is operating and (6) correct an error in the test value listedfor the hydrogen recombiner phase resistance to ground for the heater elements.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 20, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 20, 1989 <T3>Amendment No. </T3>28 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-39. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 3, 1989 (54 FR 18954). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 20, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-352, Limerick GeneratingStation, Unit 1, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>February 14, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment made administrativechanges to the Technical Specifications (TSs) to achieve consistency, removeoutdated material, make minor text changes and correct errors. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 22, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>Within 30 days of the date of issuance. <T3>Amendment No. </T3>29 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-39. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 27, 1989 (54 FR 18176). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 22, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pottstown Public Library,500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. <ITAG tagnum="84">Power Authority of the State of New York, Docket No. 50-333, JamesA. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant, Oswego County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>March 22, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment clarifies the surveillancerequirements for maintaining the Emergency Core Systems and the ReactorCore Isolation Cooling System discharge piping filled. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 22, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 22, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>132 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-59: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecification. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 3, 1989 (54 FR 18955). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 22, 1989 <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Penfield Library, State UniversityCollege of Oswego, Oswego, New York. <ITAG tagnum="84">Sacramento Municipal Utility District, Docket No. 50-312, Rancho SecoNuclear Generating Station, Sacramento County, California </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 16, 1986 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment revises the RanchoSeco License to remove the requirements for certain fire doors and dampersdescribed in the Safety Evaluation referenced in section 2.C.(4) of thelicense. The issuance of this amendment is based on the re-evaluation offire areas in the 1985 Rancho Seco Updated Fire Hazards Analysis. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 20, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 20, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>111 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-54: </T3>Amendment revised Section2.C(4) of the license. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 17, 1989 (54 FR 21315). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 20, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Martin Luther King RegionalLibrary, 7340 24th Street Bypass, Sacramento, California 95822. <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>January 27, 1989 (TS 88-31)<T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The Amendments modify the SequoyahNuclear Plant (SQN), Units 1 and 2, Technical Specifications (TS). Thechanges implement Generic Letter (GL) 85-19 and affect the actions takenwhen the plant is not in compliance with the limiting condition for operation(LCO) 3.4.8, Specific Activity, for radioiodine in the reactor coolantsystem. The changes (1) delete the Action a for Modes 1, 2 and 3, eliminatingthe reporting requirement for the number of hours above the allowable doseequivalent Iodine 131 (I-131) limit, (2) delete the part of the Actiona for Modes 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 that involves the special report requirementfor I-131 and add an additional requirement in TS Section 6.9, Annual Reports,to include an annual report to NRC regarding instances when the I-131 specificactivity limit was exceeded; and (3) delete the discussion within the BasesSection 3/4.4.8, Specific Activity, of the reporting requirement for operationin excess of 500 hours above the dose limit in a 6-month period. The proposal to delete the statement, in the Bases Section 3/4.4.8, ofrestricting plant operation in excess of 800 hours above the dose limitin a 12-month period was not acceptable because it conflicted with a statementin GL 85-19 that licensees are expected to take actions to do this. Thiswas discussed with TVA on May 30, 1989, and TVA proposed to state in theBases that ``operation with specific activity exceeding 1.0 microcuries/gramdose equivalent I-131 but within the limits shown on Figure 3.4-1 shouldbe limited to no more than 800 hours per year since the activity levelsallowed by Figure 3.4-1 increase the 2-hour thyroid dose at the site boundaryby a factor of up to 20 following a postulated steam generator tube rupture.''This statement is consistent with GL 85-19 and is, therefore, acceptable.This revision to the Bases statement does not affect the TS for Sequoyah.<T3>Effective date: </T3>June 19, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>117, 107 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>March 8, 1989 (54 FR 9934). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 21, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="84">Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-271, VermontYankee Nuclear Power Station, Vernon, Vermont </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>January 12, 1987, as clarifiedon January 29, 1988. The January 29, 1988 clarification did not alter thebasis for the proposed no significant hazards consideration finding. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications to add operability and post accident monitoring instrumentationinstalled to satisfy Regulatory Guide 1.97. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 22, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 22, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>113 <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-28: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of Initial Notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 8, 1987 (52FR11374). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 22, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>Brooks Memorial Library,224 Main Street, Brattleboro, Vermont 05301. <ITAG tagnum="84">Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281,Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia. </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>March 27, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>These amendments revise the TechnicalSpecifications relating to the canal level, canal safety-related levelactuation instrumentation and the emergency service water pumps. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 19, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 19, 1989 <T3>Amendment Nos. </T3>130 and 130 <T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-32 and DPR-37: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>April 10, 1989 (54 FR 14403). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in an Environmental Assessmentdated June 12, 1989, and in a Safety Evaluation dated June 19, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Swem Library, College ofWilliam and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185 <ITAG tagnum="84">Washington Public Power Supply System, Docket No. 50-397, NuclearProject No. 2, Benton County, Washington </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>March 31, 1989, as supplementedJune 1, 1989. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed some ofthe boundaries of, and allowed or required operations within, regions ofthe power-flow map with potential for thermal hydraulic stability in theregions by using the Advanced Nuclear Fuels ANNA Stability Monitoring System.The affected technical specifications are 3/4.2.6, 3/4.2.7, 3/4.2.8 and3/4.4.1. In addition, page B 3/4 2-1 and page 6-1 are revised to correctadministrative errors introduced in recent amendments. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 23, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 23, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>71 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-21: </T3>Amendment changed the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>May 3, 1989 (54 FR 18963). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated June 23, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Richland City Library, Swiftand Northgate Streets, Richland, Washington 99352. <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE ANDFINAL DETERMINATION OF NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION AND OPPORTUNITYFOR HEARING (EXIGENT OR EMERGENCY CIRCUMSTANCES) </ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application for the amendment complieswith the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, asamended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commissionhas made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission'srules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the licenseamendment. Because of exigent or emergency circumstances associated with the datethe amendment was needed, there was not time for the Commission to publish,for public comment before issuance, its usual 30-day Notice of Considerationof Issuance of Amendment and Proposed No Significant Hazards ConsiderationDetermination and Opportunity for a Hearing. For exigent circumstances,the Commission has either issued a <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice providing opportunity for public commentor has used local media to provide notice to the public in the area surroundinga licensee's facility of the licensee's application and of the Commission'sproposed determination of no significant hazards consideration. The Commissionhas provided a reasonable opportunity for the public to comment, usingits best efforts to make available to the public means of communicationfor the public to respond quickly, and in the case of telephone comments,the comments have been recorded or transcribed as appropriate and the licenseehas been informed of the public comments. In circumstances where failure to act in a timely way would have resulted,for example, in derating or shutdown of a nuclear power plant or in preventionof either resumption of operation or of increase in power output up tothe plant's licensed power level, the Commission may not have had an opportunityto provide for public comment on its no significant hazards determination.In such case, the license amendment has been issued without opportunityfor comment. If there has been some time for public comment but less than30 days, the Commission may provide an opportunity for public comment.If comments have been requested, it is so stated. In either event, theState has been consulted by telephone whenever possible. Under its regulations, the Commission may issue and make an amendment immediatelyeffective, notwithstanding the pendency before it of a request for a hearingfrom any person, in advance of the holding and completion of any requiredhearing, where it has determined that no significant hazards considerationis involved. The Commission has applied the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 and has made afinal determination that the amendment involves no significant hazardsconsideration. The basis for this determination is contained in the documentsrelated to this action. Accordingly, the amendments have been issued andmade effective as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impactstatement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments.If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the specialcircumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determinationbased on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationfor amendment, (2) the amendment to Facility Operating License, and (3)the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or EnvironmentalAssessment, as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspectionat the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,NW., Washington, DC, and at the local public document room for the particularfacility involved. A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Director,Division of Reactor Projects. The Commission is also offering an opportunity for a hearing with respectto the issuance of the amendments. By August 11, 1989, the licensee mayfile a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendmentto the subject facility operating license and any person whose interestmay be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a partyin the proceeding must file a written petition for leave to intervene.Requests for a hearing and petitions for leave to intervene shall be filedin accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic LicensingProceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. If a request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or anAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated by the Commission or by theChairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on therequest and/or petition and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safetyand Licensing Board will issue a notice of hearing or an appropriate order.As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceedingand how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above. Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. Since the Commission has made a final determination that the amendmentinvolves no significant hazards consideration, if a hearing is requested,it will not stay the effectiveness of the amendment. Any hearing held wouldtake place while the amendment is in effect. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building,2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC, by the above date. Where petitionsare filed during the last ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requestedthat the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephonecall to Western Union at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number3737 and the following message addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or theAtomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or request shouldbe granted based upon a balancing of the factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v)and 2.714(d). <ITAG tagnum="84">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, Docket No. 50-423, Millstone NuclearPower Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>May 9, 1989 as supplementedJune 16, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment modifies the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) as follows: (1) TS Table 3.3-6, ``Radiation Monitoringfor Plant Operation,'' is changed to allow containment purge and exhaustisolation area monitors (RE41 and RE42) to be inoperable during performanceof the containment integrated leak rate test (ILRT), (2) TS Table 3.3-11,``Fire Detection Instruments,'' is changed to require that the fire protectioninstruments in the electrical penetration area (Elevation 24andmin172; 6&quot;)be operable during the ILRT and (3) TS 3.7.12.2, ``Spray and/or SprinklerSystems,'' and TS Table 3.7-4, ``Fire Hose Stations,'' is changed to allowthe inoperability of the containment cable penetration area sprinkler systemand containment fire hose stations during the ILRT. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>June 28, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 28, 1989 <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>38 <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-49. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration:</T3>Yes. Published in <T4>Federal Register </T4>May 31, 1989 (54 FR 23317). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergency circumstances,and final determination of no significant hazards consideration are containedin a Safety Evaluation dated June 28, 1989. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry andamp;Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Russell Library, 123 BroadStreet, Middletown, Connecticut 06457. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>John F. Stolz <ITAG tagnum="84">Southern California Edison Company, et al., Docket No. 50-206, SanOnofre Nuclear Generating Station, Unit No. 1, San Diego County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>June 13, 1989 <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the actuationcircuitry for auxiliary feedwater to actuate on narrow-range steam generatorlevel, deleted the high steam generator level turbine trip from actuationon wide-range level, and added a new environmentally qualified wide-rangesteam generator level channel on each steam generator. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 23, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>This license amendment is effective the date ofissuance and must be fully implemented no later than 30 days from dateof issuance. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>129 <T3>Provisional Operating License No. DPR-13. </T3>Amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration:</T3>No. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, final determinationof no significant hazards consideration, and statement concerning consultationwith the State of California are contained in a Safety Evaluation datedJune 23, 1989. <T3>Attorneys for licensees: </T3>Charles R. Kocher, Assistant GeneralCounsel and James Beoletto, Esq., Southern California Edison Company, P.O.Box 800, Rosemead, California 91770. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>General Library, Universityof California, Post Office Box 19557, Irvine, California 92713. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>George W. Knighton <ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>June 16, 1989 (TS 89-31) <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>This amendment revises Specification3.1.3.2, ``Position Indication Systems - Operating,'' of the Sequoyah NuclearPlant, Unit 1, Technical Specifications (TS). The change adds a footnoteto Action Statement a.1 for an inoperable rod position indicator for acontrol rod in a shutdown bank. The footnote states that, for the remainderof the Unit 1 Cycle 4 operating cycle, Action a.1 will be superseded andthe position of the non-indicating control rod will be determined by amethod other than that specified in Action a.1. The provisions of Specification3.0.4 are not applicable for Action a.1 for the remainder of the Unit 1Cycle 4 operating cycle. The Tennessee Valley Authority (TVA) committed,in its letter dated June 16, 1989, to repair the inoperable control rodindicator during the first shutdown of Unit 1 of sufficient duration thatthe indicator can be repaired but no later than the Unit 1 Cycle 4 refuelingoutage. The Commission determined, pursuant to 10 CFR 50.91, that this amendmentshould be implemented as soon as possible. The amendment would permit TVAto continue determining the position of the control rod, in the shutdownbank with the inoperable RPI, without subjecting the thimble tubes to excessivewear. It has no adverse effect on safety and would be beneficial to overallplant safety. Excessive wear of the thimble tubes results in a degradationof the reactor coolant system pressure boundary and can create the possibilityof a non-isolable leak of reactor coolant. The proposed change will reducethe likelihood of the reactor coolant boundary being compromised and shouldbe permitted with minimum delay. Consequently, the NRC staff determinedthat exigent circumstances existed which justify reducing the public noticeperiod normally provided for licensing amendments. A Public Notice thatthe NRC staff proposed to amend the operating license of Unit 1, by closeof business on June 23, 1989, was published in the <T3>Chattanooga News Free Press </T3>and the <T3>Chattanooga Times </T3>on Wednesday, June 21, 1989. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>June 23, 1989 <T3>Effective date: </T3>June 23, 1989 <T3>Amendment No: </T3>118 <T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>No notice was published. The Commission's relatedevaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June23, 1989. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402. <ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 5th day of July, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Steven A. Varga, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director, Division of Reactor Projects-I/II, Office of Nuclear ReactorRegulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-16183 Filed 7-11-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-D</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>